-1-
Chrysoma Associates Limited
Publications Division - Electronic Books Library
Civilization and Its Discontents
By
SIGMUND FREUD
1929
Product Code: GSFX023
This electronic version is copyright © 2000-2005. All Rights Reserved
Chrysoma Associates Ltd,
12 Gainsborough Place, Aylesbury, Buckinghamshire HP19 8SF
England-2-
Civilization and Its Discontents
THE impression forces itself upon one that men measure by false standards, that everyone seeks power,
success, riches for himself and admires others who attain them, while undervaluing the truly precious things
in life. And yet, in making any general judgment of this kind, one is in danger of forgetting the manifold
variety of humanity and its mental life. There are certain men from whom their contemporaries do not
withhold veneration, although their greatness rests on attributes and achievements which are completely
foreign to the aims and ideals of the multitude. One might well be inclined to suppose that after all it is only
a minority who appreciate these great men, while the majority cares nothing for them. But the discrepancy
between men?s opinions and their behaviour is so wide and their desires so many-sided that things are
probably not so simple.
One of these exceptional men calls himself my friend in his letters to me. I had sent him my little book which
treats of religion as an illusion and he answered that he agreed entirely with my views on religion, but that
he was sorry I had not properly appreciated the ultimate source of religious sentiments. This consists in a
peculiar feeling, which never leaves him personally, which he finds shared by many others, and which he
may suppose millions more also experience. It is a feeling which he would like to call a sensation of eternity,
a feeling as of something limitless, unbounded, something Coceanic.C It is, he says, a purely subjective
experience, not an article of belief; it implies no assurance of personal immortality, but it is the source of the
religious spirit and is taken hold of by the various Churches and religious systems, directed by them into
definite channels, and also, no doubt, used up in them. One may rightly call oneself religious on the ground
of this oceanic feeling alone, even though one reject all beliefs and all illusions. These views, expressed by
my friend whom I so greatly honour and who himself once in poetry described the magic of illusion, put
me in a difficult position. I cannot discover this CoceanicF feeling in myself. It is not easy to deal scientifically
with feelings. One may attempt to describe their physiological signs.
Where that is impossibleHI am afraid the oceanic feeling, too, will defy this kind of classificationHnothing
remains but to turn to the ideational content which most readily associates itself with the feeling. If I have
understood my friend aright, he means the same thing as that consolation offered by an original and
somewhat unconventional writer to his hero, contemplating suicide: COut of this world we cannot fall. C 1
So it is a feeling of indissoluble connection, of belonging inseparably to the external world as a whole. To
me, personally, I may remark, this seems something more in the nature of an intellectual judgment, not. it
is true, without any accompanying feeling-tone, but with one of a kind which characterizes other equally
far-reaching reflections as well. I could not in my own person convince myself of the primary nature of such
a feeling. But I cannot on that account deny that it in fact occurs in other people. One can only wonder
whether it has been correctly interpreted and whether it is entitled to be acknowledged as the fans et origo
2 of the whole need for religion.
1 Christian Grabbe, Hannibal: )Ja, aus der Welt werden wir nicht fallen. Wir sind einmal darin. )
2 Source and origin.
I have nothing to suggest which could effectively settle the solution of this problem. The idea that man
should receive intimation of his connection with the surrounding world by a direct feeling which aims from
the outset at serving this purpose sounds so strange and is so incongruous with the structure of our
psychology that one is justified in attempting a psycho-analytic, that is, genetic explanation of such a feeling.
Whereupon the following lines of thought present themselves. Normally there is nothing we are more
certain of than the feeling of our self, our own ego. It seems to us an independent unitary thing, sharply
outlined against everything else. That this is a deceptive appearance, and that on the contrary the ego
extends inwards without any sharp delimitation, into an unconscious mental entity which we call the id and
to which it forms a facade, was first discovered by psycho-analytic research, and the latter still has much to
tell us about the relations of the ego to the id. But towards the outer world, at any rate, the ego seems to keep
itself clearly and sharply outlined and delimited. There is only one state of mind in which it fails to do
thisHan unusual state, it is true, but not one that can be judged as pathological. At its height, the state of-3-
being in love threatens to obliterate the boundaries between ego and object. Against all the evidence of his
senses, the man in love declares that he and his beloved are one, and is prepared to behave as if it were a
fact. A thing that can be temporarily effaced by a physiological function must also of course be liable to
disturbance by morbid processes. From pathology we have come to know a large number of states in which
the boundary line between ego and outer world become uncertain, or in which they are actually incorrectly
perceivedHcases in which parts of a man?s own body, even component parts of his own mind, perceptions,
thoughts, feelings, appear to him alien and not belonging to himself; other cases in which a man ascribes
to the external world things that clearly originate in himself, and that ought to be acknowledged by him.
So the ego?s cognizance of itself is subject to disturbance, and the boundaries between it and the outer world
are not immovable.
Further reflection shows that the adult?s sense of his own ego cannot have been the same from the
beginning. It must have undergone a development, which naturally cannot be demonstrated, but which
admits of reconstruction with a fair degree of probability. 3 When the infant at the breast receives stimuli,
he cannot as yet distinguish whether they come from his ego or from the outer world. He learns it gradually
as the result of various exigencies. It must make the strongest impression on him that many sources of
excitation, which later on he will recognize as his own bodily organs, can provide him at any time with
sensations, whereas others become temporarily out of his reachHamongst these what he wants most of all,
his mother?s breastHand reappear only as a result of his cries for help. Thus an object first presents itself to
the ego as something ex-isting outside, which is only induced to appear by a particular act. A further stimulus
to the growth and formation of the ego, so that it becomes something more than a bundle of sensations, i.
e., recognizes an outside, the external world. is afforded by the frequent, unavoidable and manifold pains
and unpleasant sensations which the pleasure-principle, still in unrestricted domination, bids it abolish
or avoid. The tendency arises to dissociate from the ego everything which can give rise to pain, to cast it out
and create a pure pleasure-ego, in contrast to a threatening outside, not-self. The limits of this primitive
pleasure-ego cannot escape readjustment through experience. Much that the individual wants to retain
because it is pleasure-giving is nevertheless part not of the ego but of an object; and much that he wishes
to eject because it torments him yet proves to be inseparable from the ego, arising from an inner source. He
learns a method by which, through deliberate use of the sensory organs and suitable muscular movements,
he can distinguish between internal and external Hwhat is part of the ego and what originates in the outer
worldHand thus he makes the first step towards the introduction of the reality-principle which is to control
his development further. This capacity for distinguishing which he learns of course serves a practical
purpose, that of enabling him to defend himself against painful sensations felt by him or threatening him.
Against certain painful excitations from within the ego has only the same means of defence as that employed
against pain coming from without, and this is the starting-point of important morbid disturbances.
3 Cf. the considerable volume of work on this topic dating from that of Ferenczi (Stages in the Development of the
Sense of Reality, 1913) up to FedernOs contributions. 1926, 1927 and later.
In this way the ego detaches itself from the external world. It is more correct to say: Originally the ego
includes everything, later it detaches from itself the external world. The ego-feeling we are aware of now
is thus only a shrunken vestige of a far more extensive feelingHa feeling which embraced the universe and
expressed an inseparable connection of the ego with the external world. If we may suppose that this
primary ego-feeling has been preserved in the minds of many peopleHto a greater or lesser extentH it
would co-exist like a sort of counterpart with the narrower and more sharply outlined ego-feeling of
maturity, and the ideational content belonging to it would be precisely the notion of limitless extension and
oneness with the universeHthe same feeling as that described by my friend as Coceanic. C But have we any
right to assume that the original type of feeling survives alongside the later one which has developed from
it?
Undoubtedly we have: there is nothing unusual in such a phenomenon, whether in the. psychological or
in other spheres. Where animals are concerned, we hold the view that the most highly developed have
arisen from the lowest. Yet we still find all the simple forms alive today. The great saurians are extinct and
have made way for the mammals, but a typical representative of them, the crocodile, is still living among-4-
us. The analogy may be too remote, and it is also weakened by the fact that the surviving lower species are
not as a rule the true ancestors of the present-day more highly developed types. The intermediate members
have mostly died out and are known to us only through reconstruction. In the realm of mind, on the other
hand, the primitive type is so commonly preserved alongside the transformations which have developed
out of it that it is superfluous to give instances in proof of it. When this happens, it is usually the result of
a bifurcation in development. One quantitative part of an attitude or an impulse has survived unchanged
while another has undergone further development.
This brings us very close to the more general problem of conservation in the mind, which has so far hardly
been discussed, but is so interesting and important that we may take the opportunity to pay it some
attention, even though its relevance is not immediate. Since the time when we recognized the error of
supposing that ordinary forgetting signified destruction or annihilation of the memory-trace, we have been
inclined to the opposite view that nothing once formed in the mind could ever perish, that everything
survives in some way or other, and is capable under certain conditions of being brought to light again, as,
for instance, when regression extends back far enough. One might try to picture to oneself what this
assumption signifies by a comparison taken from another field. Let us choose the history of the Eternal City
as an example. 4Historians tell us that the oldest Rome of all was the Roma quadrata, a fenced settlement on
the Palatine. Then followed the phase of the Septimontium, when the colonies on the different hills united
together; then the town which was bounded by the Servian wall; and later still, after all the transformations
in the periods of the republic and the early Caesars, the city which the Emperor Aurelian enclosed by his
walls. We will not follow the changes the city went through any further, but will ask ourselves what traces
of these early stages in its history a visitor to Rome may still find today, if he goes equipped with the most
complete historical and topographical knowledge.
4 According to The Cambridge Ancient History, Vol. VII. (1928) WThe Founding of Rome, W by Hugh Last.
Except for a few gaps, he will see the wall of Aurelian almost unchanged. He can find sections of the Servian
rampart at certain points where it has been excavated and brought to light. If he knows enoughHmore than
present-day archaeologyHhe may perhaps trace out in the structure of the town the whole course of this
wall and the outline of Roma quadrata. Of the buildings which once occupied this ancient ground-plan he will
find nothing, or but meagre fragments, for they exist no longer. With the best information about Rome of
the republican era, the utmost he could achieve would be to indicate the sites where the temples and public
buildings of that period stood. These places are now occupied by ruins, but the ruins are not those of the
early buildings themselves but of restorations of them in later times after fires and demolitions. It is hardly
necessary to mention that all these remains of ancient Rome are found woven into the fabric of a great
metropolis which has arisen in the last few centuries since the Renaissance. There is assuredly much that
is ancient still buried in the soil or under the modern buildings of the town. This is the way in which we find
antiquities surviving in historic cities like Rome.
Now let us make the fantastic supposition that Rome were not a human dwelling-place, but a mental entity
with just as long and varied a past history: that is, in which nothing once constructed had perished, and all
the earlier stages of development had survived alongside the latest. This would mean that in Rome the
palaces of the Caesars were still standing on the Palatine and the Septizonium of Septimius Severus was still
towering to its old height; that the beautiful statues were still standing in the colonnade of the Castle of St.
Angelo, as they were up to its siege by the Goths, and so on. But more still: where the Palazzo Caffarelli
stands there would also be, without this being removed, the Temple of Jupiter Capitolinus, not merely in
its latest form, moreover, as the Romans of the Caesars saw it, but also in its earliest shape, when it still wore
an Etruscan design and was adorned with terra-cotta antifixae. Where the Coliseum stands now, we could
at the same time admire Nero?s Golden House; on the Piazza of the Pantheon we should find out only the
Pantheon of today as bequeathed to us by Hadrian, but on the same site also Agrippa?s original edifice;
indeed, the same ground would support the church of Santa Maria sopra Mi-nerva and the old temple over
which it was built. And the observer would need merely to shift the focus of his eyes, perhaps, or change
his position, in order to call up a view of either the one or the other.-5-
There is clearly no object in spinning this fantasy further; it leads to the inconceivable, or even to absurdities.
If we try to represent historical sequence in spatial terms, it can only be done by juxtaposition in space; the
same space will not hold two contents. Our attempt seems like an idle game; it has only one justification;
it shows us how far away from mastering the idiosyncrasies of mental life we are by treating them in terms
of visual representation.
There is one objection, though, to which we must pay attention. It questions our choosing in particular the
past history of a city to liken to the past of the mind. Even for mental life, our assumption that everything
past is preserved holds good only on condition that the organ of the mind remains intact and its structure
has not been injured by traumas or inflammation. Destructive influences comparable to these morbid
agencies are never lacking in the history of any town, even if it has had a less chequered past than Rome,
even if. like London, it has hardly ever been pillaged by an enemy. Demolitions and the erection of new
buildings in the place of old occur in cities which have had the most peaceful existence; therefore a town is
from the outset unsuited for the comparison I have made of it with a mental organism.
We admit this objection; we will abandon our search for a striking effect of contrast and turn to what is after
all a closer object of comparison, the body of an animal or human being. But here, too, we find the same
thing. The early stages of development are in no sense still extant; they have been absorbed into the later
features for which they supplied the material. The embryo cannot be demonstrated in the adult; the thymus
gland of childhood is replaced after puberty by connective tissue but no longer exists itself; in the marrowbone
of a grown man I can, it is true, trace the outline of the childish bone-structure, but this latter no longer
survives in itselfHit lengthened and thickened until it reached its final form. The fact is that a survival of
all the early stages alongside the final form is only possible in the mind, and that it is impossible for us to
represent a phenomenon of this kind in visual terms. Perhaps we are going too far with this conclusion.
Perhaps we ought to be content with the assertion that what is past in the mind can survive and need not
necessarily perish. It is always possible that even in the mind much that is old may be so far obliterated or
absorbedHwhether normally or by way of exceptionHthat it cannot be restored or reanimated by any
means, or that survival of it is always connected with certain favourable conditions. It is possible, but we
know nothing about it. We can only be sure that it is more the rule than the exception for the past to survive
in the mind.
Thus we are entirely willing to acknowledge that the CoceanicF feeling exists in many people, and we
are disposed to relate it to an early stage in ego-feeling; the further question then arises: what claim has this
feeling to be regarded as the source of the need for religion. To me this claim does not seem very forcible.
Surely a feeling can only be a source of energy when it is itself the expression of a strong need. The
derivation of a need for religion from the child?s feeling of helplessness and the longing it evokes for a father
seems to me incontrovertible, especially since this feeling is not simply carried on from childhood days but
is kept alive perpetually by the fear of what the superior power of fate will bring. I could not point to any
need in childhood so strong as that for a father?s protection. Thus the part played by the CoceanicF feeling,
which I suppose seeks to reinstate limitless narcissism, cannot possibly take the first place. The derivation
of the religious attitude can be followed back in clear outline as far as the child?s feeling of helplessness.
There may be something else behind this, but for the present it is wrapped in obscurity.
I can imagine that the CoceanicF feeling could become connected with religion later on. That feeling of
oneness with the universe which is its ideational content sounds very like a first attempt at the consolations
of religion, like another way taken by the ego of denying the dangers it sees threatening it in the external
world. I must again confess that I find it very difficult to work with these intangible quantities. Another
friend of mine, whose insatiable scientific curiosity has impelled him to the most out-of-the-way researches
and to the acquisition of encyclopaedic knowledge, has assured me that the Yogi by their practices of
withdrawal from the world, concentrating attention on bodily functions, peculiar methods of breathing,
actually are able to produce new sensations and diffused feelings in themselves which he regards as
regressions to primordial, deeply buried mental states. He sees in them a physiological foundation, so to
speak, of much of the wisdom of mysticism. There would be connections to be made here with many-6-
obscure modifications of mental life, such as trance and ecstasy. But I am moved to exclaim, in the words
of Schiller?s diver:
Who breathes overhead in the rose-tinted light may be glad!-7-
II
IN my Future of an Illusion 5 I was concerned much less with the deepest sources of religious feeling than
with what the ordinary man understands by his religion, that system of doctrines and pledges that on the
one hand explains the riddle of this world to him with an enviable completeness, and on the other assures
him that a solicitous Providence is watching over him and will make up to him in a future existence for any
shortcomings in this life. The ordinary man cannot imagine this Providence in any other form hut that of
a greatly exalted father, for only such a one could understand the needs of the sons of men, or be softened
by their prayers and placated by the signs of their remorse. The whole thing is so patently infantile, so
incongruous with reality, that to one whose attitude to humanity is friendly it is painful to think that the
great majority of mortals will never be able to rise above this view of life. It is even more humiliating to
discover what a large number of those alive today, who must see that this religion is not tenable, yet try to
defend it inch by inch, as if with a series of pitiable rearguard actions. One would like to count oneself
among the believers, so as to admonish the philosophers who try to preserve the God of religion by
substituting for him an impersonal, shadowy, abstract principle, and say, CThou shall not take the name of
the Lord thy God in vain!F Some of the great men of the past did the same, but that is no justification for us;
we know why they had to do so.
5 1927 (London: Hogarth Press, 1928).
We will now go back to the ordinary man and his religionHthe only religion that ought to bear the name.
The well-known words of one of our great and wise poets come to mind in which he expresses his view of
the relation of religion to art and science. They run:
He who has Science and has Art,
Religion, too, has he;
Who has not Science, has not Art,
Let him religious be! 6
On the one hand, these words contrast religion with the two highest achievements of man, and on the other,
they declare that in respect of their value in life they can represent or replace each other. If we wish to
deprive even the ordinary man, too. of his religion, we shall clearly not have the authority of the poet on our
side. We will seek to get in touch with the meaning of his utterance by a special way. Life as we find it is too
hard for us; it entails too much pain, too many disappointments, impossible tasks. We cannot do without
palliative remedies. We cannot dispense with auxiliary constructions, as Theodor Fontane said. There are
perhaps three of these means: powerful diversions of interest, which lead us to care little about our misery;
substitutive gratification, which lessen it; and intoxicating substances, which make us insensitive to it.
Something of this kind is indispensable. 7 Voltaire is aiming at a diversion of interest when he brings his
Candide to a close with the advice that people should cultivate their gardens; scientific work is another
deflection of the same kind. The substitute gratifications, such as art offers, are illusions in contrast to reality,
but none the less satisfying to the mind on that account, thanks to the place which phantasy has reserved
for herself in mental life. The intoxicating substances affect our body, alter its chemical processes. It is not
so simple to find the place where religion belongs in this series. We must look further afield.
6 Goethe, Zahmen Xenien IX (Gedichte aus dem Nachlass).
7 Wilhelm Busch, in Die fromme Helene, says the same thing on a lower level: WThe man who has cares has brandy
too. W
The question, CWhat is the purpose of human life?F has been asked times without number; it has never
received a satisfactory answer; perhaps it does not admit of such an answer. Many a questioner has added
that if it should appear that life has no purpose, then it would lose all value for him. But these threats alter
nothing. It looks, on the contrary, as though one had a right to dismiss this question, for it seems to
presuppose that belief in the superiority of the human race with which we are already so familiar in its other-8-
expressions. Nobody asks what is the purpose of the lives of animals, unless peradventure they are designed
to be of service to man. But this, too, will not hold, for with many animals man can do nothingHexcept
describe, classify, and study them; and countless species have declined to be put even to this use, by living
and dying and becoming extinct before men had set eyes upon them. So again, only religion is able to
answer the question of the purpose of life. One can hardly go wrong in concluding that the idea of a purpose
in life stands and falls with the religious system.
We will turn, therefore, to the less ambitious problem: what the behaviour of men themselves reveals as the
purpose and object of their lives, what they demand of life and wish to attain in it. The answer to this can
hardly be in doubt: they seek happiness, they want to become happy and to remain so. There are two sides
to this striving, a positive and a negative; it aims on the one hand at eliminating pain and discomfort, on the
other at the experience of intense pleasures. In its narrower sense, the word happiness relates only to the last.
Thus human activities branch off in two directionsHcorresponding to this double goalHaccording to which
of the two they aim at realizing, either predominantly or even exclusively.
As we see, it is simply the pleasure-principle which draws up the programme of life?s purpose. This
principle dominates the operation of the mental apparatus from the very beginning; there can be no doubt
about its efficiency, and yet its programme is in conflict with the whole world, with the macrocosm as much
as with the microcosm. It simply cannot be put into execution, the whole constitution of things runs counter
to it; one might say the intention that man should be happy is not included in the scheme of Creation. What
is called happiness in its narrowest sense comes from the satisfactionHmost often instantaneousHof pent-up
needs which have reached great intensity, and by its very nature can only be a transitory experience. When
any condition desired by the pleasure-principle is protracted, it results in a feeling only of mild comfort; we
are so constituted that we can only intensely enjoy contrasts, much less intensely states in themselves. 8 Our
possibilities of happiness are thus limited from the start by our very constitution. It is much less difficult to
be unhappy. Suffering comes from three quarters: from our own body, which is destined to decay and
dissolution, and cannot even dispense with anxiety and pain as danger-signals; from the outer world, which
can rage against us with the most powerful and pitiless forces of destruction; and finally from our relations
with other men. The unhappiness which has this last origin we find perhaps more painful than any other;
we tend to regard it more or less as a gratuitous addition, although it cannot be any less an inevitable fate
than the suffering that proceeds from other sources.
8Goethe even warns us that Wnothing is so hard to bear as a train of happy days. W This may be an exaggeration all
the same.
It is no wonder if, under the pressure of these possibilities of suffering, humanity is wont to reduce its
demands for happiness, just as even the pleasure-principle itself changes into the more accommodating
reality-principle under the influence of external environment; if a man thinks himself happy if he has merely
escaped unhappiness or weathered trouble; if in general the task of avoiding pain forces that of obtaining
pleasure into the background. Reflection shows that there are very different ways of attempting to perform
this task; and all these ways have been recommended by the various schools of wisdom in the art of life and
put into practice by men. Unbridled gratification of all desires forces itself into the foreground as the most
alluring guiding principle in life, but it entails preferring enjoyment to caution and penalizes itself after short
indulgence. The other methods, in which avoidance of pain is the main motive, are differentiated according
to the source of the suffering against which they are mainly directed. Some of these measures are extreme
and some moderate, some are one-sided and some deal with several aspects of the matter at once. Voluntary
loneliness, isolation from others, is the readiest safeguard against the unhappiness that may arise out of
human relations. We know what this means: the happiness found along this path is that of peace. Against
the dreaded outer world one can defend oneself only by turning away in some other direction, if the
difficulty is to be solved single-handed. There is indeed another and better way: that of combining with the
rest of the human community and taking up the attack on nature, thus forcing it to obey human will, under
the guidance of science. One is working, then, with all for the good of all. But the most interesting methods
for averting pain are those which aim in influencing the organism itself. In the last analysis, all pain is but-9-
sensation; it only exists in so far as we feel it, and we feel it only in consequence of certain characteristics of
our organism.
The crudest of these methods of influencing the body, but. also the most effective, is the chemical one: that
of intoxication. I do not think anyone entirely understands their operation, but it is a fact that there are
certain substances foreign to the body which, when present in the blood or tissues, directly cause us
pleasurable sensations, but also so change the conditions of our perceptivity that we become insensible of
disagreeable sensations. The two effects not only take place simultaneously, they seem to be closely bound
up with each other. But there must be substances in the chemical composition of our bodies which can do
the same, for we know of at least one morbid state, that of mania, in which a condition similar to this
intoxication arises without any drug being absorbed, Besides this, our normal mental life shows variations,
according to which pleasure is experienced with more or less ease, and along with this goes a diminished
or increased sensitivity to pain. It is greatly to be regretted that this toxic aspect of mental processes has so
far eluded scientific research. The services rendered by intoxicating substances in the struggle for
happiness and in warding off misery rank so highly as a benefit that both individuals and races have given
them an established position within their libido-economy. It is not merely the immediate gain in pleasure
which one owes to them, but also a measure of that independence of the outer world which is so sorely
craved. Men know that with the help they can get from Cdrowning their caresF they can at any time
slip away from the oppression of reality and find a refuge in a world of their own where painful feelings
do not enter. We are aware that it is just this property which constitutes the danger and injuriousness of
intoxicating substances. In certain circumstances they are to blame when valuable energies which could have
been used to improve the lot of humanity are uselessly wasted.
The complicated structure of our mental apparatus admits, however, of a whole series of other kinds of
influence. The gratification of instincts is happiness, but when the outer world lets us starve, refuses us
satisfaction of our needs, they become the cause of very great suffering. So the hope is born that by
influencing these impulses one may escape some measure of suffering. This type of defence against pain no
longer relates to the sensory apparatus; it seeks to control the internal sources of our needs themselves. An
extreme form of it consists in annihilation of the instincts, as taught by the wisdom of the East and practised
by the Yogi. When it succeeds, it is true, it involves giving up all other activities as well (sacrificing the whole
of life), and again, by another path, the only happiness it brings is that of peace. The same way is taken when
the aim is less extreme and only control of the instincts is sought. When this is so, the higher mental systems
which recognize the reality-principle have the upper hand. The aim of gratification is by no means
abandoned in this case; a certain degree of protection against suffering is secured, in that lack of satisfaction
causes less pain when the instincts are kept in check than when they are unbridled. On the other hand, this
brings with it an undeniable reduction in the degree of enjoyment obtainable. The feeling of happiness
produced by indulgence of a wild, untamed craving is incomparably more intense than is the satisfying of
a curbed desire. The irresistibility of perverted impulses, perhaps the charm of forbidden things generally,
may in this way be explained economically.
Another method of guarding against pain is by using the libido-displacements that our mental equipment
allows of, by which it gains so greatly in flexibility. The task is then one of transferring the instinctual aims
into such directions that they cannot be frustrated by the outer world. Sublimation of the instincts lends an
aid in this. Its success is greatest when a man knows how to heighten sufficiently his capacity for obtaining
pleasure from mental and intellectual work. Fate has little power against him then. This kind of satisfaction,
such as the artist?s joy in creation, in embodying his phantasies, or the scientist?s in solving problems or
discovering truth, has a special quality which we shall certainly one day be able to define
metapsychologically. Until then we can only say metaphorically it seems to us higher and finer, but,
compared with that of gratifying gross primitive instincts, its intensity is tempered and diffused; it does not
overwhelm us physically. The weak point of this method, however, is that it is not generally applicable; it
is only available to the few.It presupposes special gifts and dispositions which are not very commonly found
in a sufficient degree. And even to these few it does not secure complete protection against suffering; it gives
no invulnerable armour against the arrows of fate, and it usually fails when a man?s own body becomes a
source of suffering to him. 9-10-
9 When there is no special disposition in a man imperatively prescribing the direction of his life-interest, the
ordinary work all can do for a livelihood can play the part which Voltaire wisely advocated it should do in our lives.
It is not possible to discuss the significance of work for the economics of the libido adequately within the limits
of a short survey. Laying stress upon importance of work has a greater effect than any other technique of living in
the direction of binding the individual more closely to reality; in his work he is at least securely attached to a part
of reality, the human community. Work is no less valuable for the opportunity it and the human relations connected
with it provide for a very considerable discharge of libidinal component impulses, narcissistic, aggressive, and even
erotic, than because it is indispensable for subsistence and justifies existence in a society. The daily work of earning
a livelihood affords particular satisfaction when it has been selected by free choice, i.e., when through sublimation
it enables use to be made of existing inclinations, of instinctual impulses that have retained their strength or are
more intense than usual for constitutional reasons. And yet as a path to happiness work is not valued very highly
by men. They do not run after it as they do after other opportunities for gratification. The great majority work only
when forced by necessity, and this natural human aversion to work gives rise to the most difficult social problems.
This behaviour reveals clearly enough its aimHthat of making oneself independent of the external world,
by looking for happiness in the inner things of the mind; in the next method the same features are even
more marked. The connection with reality is looser still; satisfaction is obtained through illusions, which are
recognized as such, without the discrepancy between them and reality being allowed to interfere with
the pleasure they give. These illusions are derived from the life of phantasy which, at the time when the
sense of reality developed, was expressly exempted from the demands of the reality-test and set apart for
the purpose of fulfilling wishes which would be very hard to realize. At the head of these phantasypleasures
stands the enjoyment of works of art which through the agency of the artist is opened to those
who cannot themselves create. 10 Those who are sensitive to the influence of art do not know how to rate
it high enough as a source of happiness and consolation in life. Yet art affects us but as a mild narcotic and
can provide no more than a temporary refuge for us from the hardships of life; its influence is not strong
enough to make us forget real misery.
10 Cf. WFormulations regarding the Two Principles in Mental Functioningc (1911), Collected Papers, IV; and General
Introduction to Psycho-Analysis (1915-17). Lecture XXIII.
Another method operates more energetically and thoroughly; it regards reality as the source of all suffering,
as the one and only enemy, with whom life is intolerable and with whom, therefore, all relations must be
broken off if one is to be happy in any way at all. The hermit turns his back on this world; he will have
nothing to do with it. But one can do more than that; one can try to re-create it. try to build up another
instead, from which the most unbearable features are eliminated and replaced by others corresponding to
one?s own wishes. He who in his despair and defiance sets out on this path will not as a rule get very far;
reality will be too strong for him. He becomes a madman and usually finds no one to help him in carrying
through his delusion. It is said, however, that each one of us behaves in some respect like the paranoiac,
substituting a wish-fulfilment for some aspect of the world which is unbearable to him, and carrying this
delusion through into reality. When a large number of people make this attempt together and try to obtain
assurance of happiness and protection from suffering by a delusional transformation of reality, it
acquires special significance. The religions of humanity, too, must be classified as mass-delusions of this
kind. Needless to say, no one who shares a delusion recognizes it as such.
I do not suppose that I have enumerated all the methods by which men strive to win happiness and keep
suffering at bay, and I know, too, that the material might have been arranged differently. One of these
methods I have not yet mentioned at allHnot because I had forgotten it, but because it will interest us in
another connection. How would it be possible to forget this way of all others of practising the art of life! It
is conspicuous for its remarkable capacity to combine characteristic features. Needless to say, it, too, strives
to bring about independence of fateH as we may best call itHand with this object it looks for satisfaction
within the mind, and uses the capacity for displacing libido which we mentioned before, but it does not turn
away from the outer world; on the contrary, it takes a firm hold of its objects and obtains happiness from
an emotional relation to them. Nor is it content to strive for avoidance of painHthat goal of weary
resignation; rather it passes that by heedlessly and holds fast to the deep-rooted, passionate striving for a
positive fulfilment of happiness. Perhaps it really comes nearer to this goal than any other method. I am-11-
speaking, of course, of that way of life which makes love the centre of all things and anticipates all happiness
from loving and being loved. This attitude is familiar enough to all of us; one of the forms in which love
manifests itself, sexual love, gives us our most intense experience of an overwhelming pleasurable sensation
and so furnishes a prototype for our strivings after happiness. What is more natural than that we should
persist in seeking happiness along the path by which we first encountered it? The weak side of this way of
living is clearly evident; and were it not for this, no human being would ever have thought of abandoning
this path to happiness in favour of any other. We are never so defenceless against suffering as when we
love, never so forlornly unhappy as when we have lost our love-object or its love. But this does not complete
the story of that way of life which bases happiness on love; there is much more to be said about it.
We may here go on to consider the interesting case in which happiness in life is sought first and foremost
in the enjoyment of beauty, wherever it is to be found by our senses and our judgment, the beauty of human
forms and movements, of natural objects, of landscapes, of artistic and even scientific creations. As a goal
in life, this aesthetic attitude offers little protection against the menace of suffering, but it is able to
compensate for a great deal. The enjoyment of beauty produces a particular, mildly intoxicating kind of
sensation. There is no very evident use in beauty; the necessity of it for cultural purposes is not apparent,
and yet civilization could not do without it. The science of aesthetics investigates the conditions in which
things are regarded as beautiful; it can give no explanation of the nature or origin of beauty: as usual, its lack
of results is concealed under a flood of resounding and meaningless words. Unfortunately, psycho-analysis,
too, has less to say about beauty than about most things. Its derivation from the realms of sexual sensation
is all that seems certain; the love of beauty is a perfect example of a feeling with an inhibited aim. Beauty and
attraction are first of all the attributes of a sexual object. It is remarkable that the genitals themselves. the
sight of which is always exciting, are hardly ever regarded as beautiful; the quality of beauty seems, on the
other hand, to attach to certain secondary sexual characters.
In spite of the incompleteness of these considerations, I will venture on a few remarks in conclusion of this
discussion. The goal towards which the pleasure-principle impels us Hof becoming happyHis not
attainable; yet we may notHnay, cannotHgive up the effort to come nearer to realization of it by some
means or other. Very different paths may be taken towards it: some pursue the positive aspect of the aim,
attainment of pleasure; others the negative, avoidance of pain. By none of these ways can we achieve all that
we desire. In that modified sense in which we have seen it to be attainable, happiness is a problem of the
economics of the libido in each individual. There is no sovereign recipe in this matter which suits all; each
one must find out for himself by which particular means he may achieve felicity. All kinds of different
factors will operate to influence his choice. It depends on how much real gratification he is likely to obtain
in the external world, and how far he will find it necessary to make himself independent of it; finally, too,
on the belief he has in himself of his power to alter it in accordance with his wishes. Even at this stage the
mental constitution of the individual will play a decisive part, aside from any external considerations. The
man who is predominantly erotic will choose emotional relationships with others before all else; the
narcissistic type, who is more self-sufficient, will seek his essential satisfactions in the inner workings of his
own soul; the man of action will never abandon the external world in which he can essay his power. The
interests of narcissistic types will be determined by their particular gifts and the degree of instinctual
sublimation of which they are capable. When any choice is pursued to an extreme, it penalizes itself, in that
it exposes the individual to the dangers accompanying any one exclusive life-interest which may always
prove inadequate. Just as a cautious businessman avoids investing all his capital in one concern, so wisdom
would probably admonish us also not to anticipate all our happiness from one quarter alone. Success is
never certain; it depends on the co-operation of many factors, perhaps on none more than the capacity of
the mental constitution to adapt itself to the outer world and then utilize this last for obtaining pleasure.
Any one who is born with a specially unfavourable instinctual constitution and whose libido-components
do not go through the transformation and modification necessary for successful achievement in later life,
will find it hard to obtain happiness from his external environment, especially if he is faced with the more
difficult tasks. One last possibility of dealing with life remains to such people and it offers them at least
substitute-gratifications; it takes the form of the flight into neurotic illness, and they mostly adopt it while
they are still young. Those whose efforts to obtain happiness come to nought in later years still find-12-
consolation in the pleasure of chronic intoxication, or else they embark upon that despairing attempt at
revoltHpsychosis.
Religion circumscribes these measures of choice and adaptation by urging upon everyone alike its single
way of achieving happiness and guarding against pain. Its method consists in decrying the value of life and
promulgating a view of the real world that is distorted like a delusion, and both of these imply a preliminary
intimidating influence upon intelligence. At such a costHby the forcible imposition of mental infantilism
and inducing a mass-delusionH religion succeeds in saving many people from individual neuroses. But little
more. There are, as we have said, many paths by which the happiness attainable for man can be reached,
but none which is certain to take him to it. Nor can religion keep her promises either. When the faithful find
themselves reduced in the end to speaking of God?s inscrutable decree, they thereby avow that all that is left
to them in their sufferings is unconditional submission as a last-remaining consolation and source of
happiness. And if a man is willing to come to this, he could probably have arrived there by a shorter road.-13-
III
OUR discussion of happiness has so far not taught us much that is not already common knowledge. Nor
does the prospect of discovering anything new seem much greater if we go on with the problem of why it
is so hard for mankind to be happy. We gave the answer before, when we cited the three sources of human
sufferings, namely, the superior force of nature, the disposition to decay of our bodies, and the inadequacy
of our methods of regulating human relations in the family, the community, and the state. In regard to the
first two, our judgment cannot hesitate: it forces us to recognize these sources of suffering and to submit to
the inevitable. We shall never completely subdue nature; our body, too, is an organism, itself a part of
nature, and will always contain the seeds of dissolution, with its limited power of adaptation and
achievement. The effect of this recognition is in no way disheartening; on the contrary, it points out the
direction for our efforts. If we cannot abolish all suffering, yet a great deal of it we can, and can mitigate
more; the experience of several thousand years has convinced us of this. To the third, the social source of
our distresses, we take up a different attitude. We prefer not to regard it as one at all; we cannot see why
the systems we have ourselves created should not rather ensure protection and well-being for us all. To be
sure, when we consider how unsuccessful our efforts to safeguard against suffering in this particular have
proved, the suspicion dawns upon us that a bit of unconquerable nature lurks concealed behind this
difficulty as wellH in the shape of our own mental constitution.
When we start to consider this possibility, we come across a point of view which is so amazing that we will
pause over it. According to it, our so-called civilization itself is to blame for a great part of our misery, and
we should be much happier if we were to give it up and go back to primitive conditions. I call this amazing
becauseHhowever one may define culture Hit is undeniable that every means by which we try to guard
ourselves against menaces from the several sources of human distress is a part of this same culture.
How has it come about that so many people have adopted this strange attitude of hostility to civilization?
In my opinion, it arose from a background of profound long-standing discontent with the existing state of
civilization, which finally crystallized into this judgment as a result of certain historical happenings. I believe
I can identify the last two of these; I am not learned enough to trace the links in the chain back into the
history of the human species. At the time when Christianity conquered the pagan religions, some such
antagonism to culture must already have been actively at work. It is closely related to the low estimation
put upon earthly life by Christian doctrine. The earlier of the last two historical developments was when,
as a result of voyages of discovery, men came into contact with primitive peoples and races. To the
Europeans, who failed to observe them carefully and misunderstood what they saw, these people seemed
to lead simple, happy livesHwanting for nothing Hsuch as the travellers who visited them, with all their
superior culture, were unable to achieve. Later experience has corrected this opinion on many points; in
several instances the ease of life was due to the bounty of nature and the possibilities of ready satisfaction
for the great human needs, but it was erroneously attributed to the absence of the complicated conditions
of civilization. The last of the two historical events is especially familiar to us; it was when people began to
understand the nature of the neuroses which threaten to undermine the modicum of happiness open to
civilized man. It was found that men become neurotic because they cannot tolerate the degree of privation
that society imposes on them in virtue of its cultural ideals, and it was supposed that a return to greater
possibilities of happiness would ensue if these standards were abolished or greatly relaxed.
And there exists an element of disappointment, in addition. In the last generations, man has made
extraordinary strides in knowledge of the natural sciences and technical application of them, and has
established his dominion over nature in a way never before imagined. The details of this forward progress
are universally known: it is unnecessary to enumerate them. Mankind is proud of its exploits and has a right
to be. But men are beginning to perceive that all this newly-won power over space and time, this conquest
of the forces of nature, this fulfilment of age-old longings, has not increased the amount of pleasure they can
obtain in life, has not made them feel any happier. The valid conclusion from this is merely that power over
nature is not the only condition of human happiness, just as it is not the only goal of civilization?s efforts,
and there is no ground for inferring that its technical progress is worthless from the standpoint of happiness.
It prompts one to exclaim: Is it not then a positive pleasure, an unequivocal gain in happiness, to be able to-14-
hear, whenever I like, the voice of a child living hundreds of miles away, or to know directly a friend of mine
arrives at his destination that he has come well and safely through the long and troublesome voyage? And
is it nothing that medical science has succeeded in enormously reducing the mortality of young children,
the dangers of infection for women in childbirth, indeed, in very considerably prolonging the average length
of human life? And there is still a long list one could add to these benefits that we owe to the much-despised
era of scientific and practical progressHbut a critical, pessimistic voice makes itself heard, saying that most
of these advantages follow the model of those Ccheap pleasuresF in the anecdote. One gets this enjoyment
by sticking one?s bare leg outside the bedclothes on a cold winter?s night and then drawing it in again. If
there were no railway to make light of distances, my child would never have left home, and I should not
need the telephone to hear his voice. If there were no vessels crossing the ocean, my friend would never
have embarked on his voyage, and I should not need the telegraph to relieve my anxiety about him. What
is the use of reducing the mortality of children, when it is precisely this reduction which imposes the greatest
moderation on us in begetting them, so that taken all round we do not rear more children than in the days
before the reign of hygiene, while at the same time we have created difficult conditions for sexual life in
marriage and probably counteracted the beneficial effects of natural selection? And what do we gain by a
long life when it is full of hardship and starved of joys and so wretched that we can only welcome death as
our deliverer?
It seems to be certain that our present-day civilization does not inspire in us a feeling of well-being, but it
is very difficult to form an opinion whether in earlier times people felt any happier and what part their
cultural conditions played in the question. We always tend to regard trouble objectively, i. e., to place
ourselves with our own wants and our own sensibilities in the same conditions, so as to discover what
opportunities for happiness or unhappiness we should find in them. This method of considering the
problem, which appears to be objective because it ignores the varieties of subjective sensitivity, is of course
the most subjective possible, for by applying it one substitutes one?s own mental attitude for the unknown
attitude of other men. Happiness, on the contrary, is something essentially subjective. However we may
shrink in horror at the thought of certain situations, that of the galley-slaves in antiquity, of the peasants in
the Thirty Years? War, of the victims of the Inquisition, of the Jews awaiting a pogrom, it is still impossible
for us to feel ourselves into the position of these people, to imagine the differences which would be brought
about by constitutional obtuseness of feeling, gradual stupefaction, the cessation of all anticipation, and by
all the grosser and more subtle ways in which insensibility to both pleasurable and painful sensations can
be induced. Moreover, on occasions when the most extreme forms of suffering have to be endured, special
mental protective devices come into operation. It seems to me unprofitable to follow up this aspect of the
problem further.
It is time that we should turn our attention to the nature of this culture, the value of which is so much
disputed from the point of view of happiness. Until we have learnt something by examining it for ourselves,
we will not look round for formulas which express its essence in a few words. We will be content to repeat
11that the word culture describes the sum of the achievements and institutions which differentiate our lives
from those of our animal forebears and serve two purposes, namely, that of protecting humanity against
nature and of regulating the relations of human beings among themselves. In order to learn more than this,
we must bring together the individual features of culture as they are manifested in human communities. We
shall have no hesitation in allowing ourselves to be guided by the common usages of language, or, as one
might say, the feeling of language, confident that we shall thus take into account inner attitudes which still
resist expression in abstract terms.
11 Cf. The Future of an Illusion.
The beginning is easy. We recognize as belonging to culture all the activities and possessions which men
use to make the earth serviceable to them, to protect them against the tyranny of natural forces, and so on.
There is less doubt about this aspect of civilization than any other. If we go back far enough, we find that
the first acts of civilization were the use of tools, the gaining of power over fire, and the construction of
dwellings. Among these the acquisition of power over fire stands out as a quite exceptional achievement,
without a prototype; 12 while the other two opened up paths which have ever since been pursued by man,-15-
the stimulus towards which is easily imagined. By means of all his tools, man makes his own organs more
perfectHboth the motor and the sensoryHor else removes the obstacles in the way of their activity.
Machinery places gigantic power at his disposal which, like his muscles, he can employ in any direction;
ships and aircraft have the effect that neither air nor water can prevent his traversing them. With spectacles
he corrects the defects of the lens in his own eyes; with telescopes he looks at far distances; with the
microscope he overcomes the limitations in visibility due to the structure of his retina. With the
photographic camera he has created an instrument which registers transitory visual impressions, just as the
gramophone does with equally transient auditory ones; both are at bottom materializations of his own
power of memory. With the help of the telephone he can hear at distances which even fairy-tales would treat
as insuperable; writing to begin with was the voice of the absent; dwellings were a substitute for the
mother?s womb, that first abode, in which he was safe and felt so content, for which he probably yearns ever
after.
12 Psycho-analytic material, as yet incomplete and not capable of unequivocal interpretation, nevertheless admits
of a surmiseewhich sounds fantastic enoughe about the origin of this human feat. It is as if primitive man had
had the impulse, when he came in contact with fire, to gratify an infantile pleasure in respect of it and put it out with
a stream of urine. The legends that we possess leave no doubt that flames shooting upwards like tongues were
originally felt to have a phallic sense. Putting out fire by urinatinge which is also introduced in the later fables of
Gulliver in Lilliput and RabelaisOs Gargantuaetherefore represented a sexual act with a man, an enjoyment of
masculine potency in homosexual rivalry. Whoever was the first to deny himself this pleasure and spare the fire
was able to take it with him and break it in to his own service. By curbing the fire of his own sexual passion, he was
able to tame fire as a force of nature. This great cultural victory was thus a reward for re framing from gratification
of an instinct. Further, it is as if man had placed woman by the hearth as the guardian of the fire he had taken
captive, because her anatomy makes it impossible for her to yield to such a temptation. It is remarkable how
regularly analytic findings testify to the close connection between the ideas of ambition, fire, and urethral erotism.
It sounds like a fairy-tale, but not only that; this story of what man by his science and practical inventions
has achieved on this earth, where he first appeared as a weakly member of the animal kingdom, and on
which each individual of his species must ever again appear as a helpless infantH0 inch of nature!H is a
direct fulfilment of all, or of most, of the dearest wishes in his fairy-tales. AH these possessions he has
acquired through culture. Long ago he formed an ideal conception of omnipotence and omniscience which
he embodied in his gods. Whatever seemed unattainable to his desiresHor forbidden to himHhe attributed
to these gods. One may say, therefore, that these gods were the ideals of his culture. Now he has himself
approached very near to realizing this ideal, he has nearly become a god himself. But only, it is true, in the
way that ideals are usually realized in the general experience of humanity. Not completely; in some respects
not at all, in others only by halves. Man has become a god by means of artificial limbs, so to speak, quite
magnificent when equipped with all his accessory organs; but they do not grow on him and they still give
him trouble at times. However, lie is entitled to console himself with the thought that this evolution will not
come to an end in A. D. 1930. Future ages will produce further great advances in this realm of culture,
probably inconceivable now. and will increase man?s likeness to a god still more. But with the aim of our
study in mind, we will not forget, all the same, that the human being of today is not happy with all his
likeness to a god.
Thus we recognize that a country has attained a high level of civilization when we find that everything in
it that can be helpful in exploiting the earth for man?s benefit and in protecting him against
natureHeverything, in short, that is useful to himHis cultivated and effectively protected. In such a country,
the course of rivers which threaten to overflow their banks is regulated, their waters guided through canals
to places where they are needed. The soil is industriously cultivated and planted with the vegetation suited
to it; the mineral wealth is brought up assiduously from the depths and wrought into the implements and
utensils that are required. The means of communications are frequent, rapid, and reliable; wild and
dangerous animals have been exterminated, the breeding of tamed and domesticated ones prospers. But we
demand other things besides these of civilization, and curiously enough, we expect to find them existing
in the same countries. As if we wished to repudiate the first requisition we made, we count it also as proof
of a high level of civilization when we see that the industry of the inhabitants is applied as well to things
which are not in the least useful and, on the contrary seem to be useless, e. g., when the parks and gardens-16-
in a town, which are necessary as playgrounds and air-reservoirs, also bear flowering plants, or when the
windows of dwellings are adorned with flowers. We soon become aware that the useless thing which we
require of civilization is beauty; we expect a cultured people to revere beauty where it is found in nature and
to create it in their handiwork so far as they are able. But this is far from exhausting what we require of
civilization. Besides, we expect to see the signs of cleanliness and order. We do not think highly of the
cultural level of an English country town in the time of Shakespeare when we read that there was a tall
dung-heap in front of his father?s house in Stratford; we are indignant and call it Cbarbarous, C which is the
opposite of civilized, when we find the paths in the Wiener Wald littered with paper. Dirt of any kind seems
to us incompatible with civilization; we extend our demands for cleanliness to the human body also, and
are amazed to hear what an objectionable odour emanated from the person of the Roi Soleil; we shake our
heads when we are shown the tiny washbasin on the Isola Bella which Napoleon used for his daily
ablutions. Indeed, we are not surprised if anyone employs the use of soap as a direct measure of civilization.
It is the same with order, which, like cleanliness, relates entirely to man?s handiwork. But whereas we cannot
expect cleanliness in nature, order has, on the contrary, been imitated from nature; man?s observations of
the great astronomical periodicities not only furnished him with a model, but formed the ground-plan of
his first attempts to introduce order into his own life. Order is a kind of repetition-compulsion by which it
is ordained once for all when, where and how a thing shall be done so that on every similar occasion doubt
and hesitation shall be avoided. The benefits of order are incontestable: it enables us to use space and time
to the best advantage, while saving expenditure of mental energy. One would be justified in expecting that
it would have ingrained itself from the start and without opposition into all human activities; and one may
well wonder that this has not happened, and that, on the contrary, human beings manifest an inborn
tendency to negligence, irregularity, and untrustworthiness in their work, and have to be laboriously trained
to imitate the example of their celestial models.
Beauty, cleanliness, and order clearly occupy a peculiar position among the requirements of civilization. No
one will maintain that they are as essential to life as the activities aimed at controlling the forces of nature
and as other factors which we have yet to mention; and yet no one would willingly relegate them to the
background as trivial matters. Beauty is an instance which plainly shows that culture is not simply utilitarian
in its aims, for the lack of beauty is a thing we cannot tolerate in civilization. The utilitarian advantages of
order are quite apparent; with regard to cleanliness, we have to remember that it is required of us by
hygiene, and we may surmise that even before the days of scientific prophylaxis the connection between the
two was not altogether unsuspected by mankind. But these aims and endeavours of culture are not entirely
to be explained on utilitarian lines; there must be something else at work besides.
According to general opinion, however, thereis one feature of culture which characterizes it better than any
other, and that is the value it sets upon the higher mental activitiesHintellectual, scientific, and aesthetic
achievementH the leading part it concedes to ideas in human life. First and foremost among these ideas
come the religious systems with their complicated evolution, on which I have elsewhere endeavoured to
throw a light; next to them come philosophical speculations; and last, the ideals man has formed, his
conceptions of the perfection possible in an individual, in a people, in humanity as a whole, and the
demands he makes on the basis of these conceptions. These creations of his mind are not independent of
each other; on the contrary, they are closely interwoven, and this complicates the attempt to describe them,
as well as that to trace their psychological derivation. If we assume as a general hypothesis that the force
behind all human activities is a striving towards the two convergent aims of profit and pleasure, we must
then acknowledge this as valid also for these other manifestations of culture, although it can be plainly
recognized as true only in respect of science and art. It cannot be doubted, however, that the remainder, too,
correspond to some powerful need in human beingsHperhaps to one which develops fully only in a
minority of people. Nor may we allow ourselves to be misled by our own judgments concerning the value
of any of these religious or philosophical systems or of these ideals; whether we look upon them as the
highest achievement of the human mind, or whether we deplore them as fallacies, one must acknowledge
that where they exist, and especially where they are in the ascendant, they testify to a high level of
civilization.-17-
We now have to consider the last, and certainly by no means the least important, of the components of
culture, namely, the ways in which social relations, the relations of one man to another, are regulated, all
that has to do with him as a neighbour, a source of help, a sexual object to others, a member of a family or
of a state. It is especially difficult in this matter to remain unbiased by any ideal standards and to ascertain
exactly what is specifically cultural here. Perhaps one might begin with the statement that the first attempt
ever made to regulate these social relations already contained the essential element of civilization. Had no
such attempt been made, these relations would be subject to the wills of individuals: that is to say, the man
who was physically strongest would decide things in accordance with his own interests and desires. The
situation would remain the same, even though this strong man should in his turn meet with another who
was stronger than he. Human life in communities only becomes possible when a number of men unite
together in strength superior to any single individual and remain united against all single individuals. The
strength of this united body is then opposed as right against the strength of any individual, which is
condemned as brute force. This substitution of the power of a united number for the power of a single man
is the decisive step towards civilization. The essence of it lies in the circumstance that the members of the
community have restricted their possibilities of gratification, whereas the individual recognized no such
restrictions. The first requisite of culture, therefore, is justiceH that is, the assurance that a law once made
will not be broken in favour of any individual. This implies nothing about the ethical value of any such law.
The further course of cultural development seems to tend towards ensuring that the law shall no longer
represent the will of any small bodyHcaste, tribe, section of the populationHwhich may behave like a
predatory individual towards other such groups perhaps containing larger numbers. The end-result would
be a state of law to which allHthat is, all who are capable of unitingHhave contributed by making some
sacrifice of their own desires, and which leaves noneHagain with the same exceptionHat the mercy of brute
force.
The liberty of the individual is not a benefit of culture. It was greatest before any culture, though indeed it
had little value at that time, because the individual was hardly in a position to defend it. Liberty has
undergone restrictions through the evolution of civilization, and justice demands that these restrictions shall
apply to all. The desire for freedom that makes itself felt in a human community may be a revolt against
some existing injustice and so may prove favourable to a further development of civilization and remain
compatible with it. But it may also have its origin in the primitive roots of the personality, still unfettered
by civilizing influences, and so become a source of antagonism to culture. Thus the cry for freedom is
directed either against particular forms or demands of culture or else against culture itself. It does not seem
as if man could be brought by any sort of influence to change his nature into that of the ants; he will always,
one imagines, defend his claim to individual freedom against the will of the multitude. A great part of the
struggles of mankind centres round the single task of finding some expedient (i.e., satisfying) solution
between these individual claims and those of the civilized community; it is one of the problems of man?s fate
whether this solution can be arrived at in some particular form of culture or whether the conflict will prove
irreconcilable.
We have obtained a clear impression of the general picture presented by culture through adopting the
common view as to which aspects of human life are to be called cultural; but it is true that so far we have
discovered nothing that is not common knowledge. We have, however, at the same time guarded
ourselves against accepting the misconception that civilization is synonymous with becoming perfect, is the
path by which man is ordained to reach perfection. But now a certain point of view presses for
consideration; it will lead perhaps in another direction. The evolution of culture seems to us a peculiar kind
of process passing over humanity, of which several aspects strike us as familiar. We can describe this process
in terms of the modifications it effects on the known human instinctual dispositions, which it is the economic
task of our lives to satisfy. Some of these instincts become absorbed, as it were, so that something appears
in place of them which in an individual we call a character-trait. The most remarkable example of this process
is found in respect of the anal erotism of young human beings. Their primary interest in the excretory
function, its organs and products, is changed in the course of their growth into a group of traits that we
know wellH thriftiness, orderliness, and cleanlinessHvaluable and welcome qualities in themselves, which,
however, may be intensified till they visibly dominate the personality and produce what we call the anal
character. How this happens we do not know; but there is no doubt about the accuracy of this conclusion.-18-
13 Now, we have seen that order and cleanliness are essentially cultural demands, although the necessity
of them for survival is not particularly apparent, any more than their suitability as sources of pleasure. At
this point we must be struck for the first time with the similarity between the process of cultural
development and that of the libidinal development in an individual. Other instincts have to be induced to
change the conditions of their gratification, to find it along other paths, a process which is usually identical
with what we know so well as sublimation (of the aim of an instinct), but which can sometimes be
differentiated from this. Sublimation of instinct is an especially conspicuous feature of cultural evolution;
this it is that makes it possible for the higher mental operations, scientific, artistic, ideological activities, to
play such an important part in civilized life. If one were to yield to a first impression, one would be tempted
to say that sublimation is a fate which has been forced upon instincts by culture alone. But it is better to
reflect over this a while longer. Thirdly and lastly, and this seems most important of all, it is impossible to
ignore the extent to which civilization is built up on renunciation of instinctual gratifications, the degree to
which the existence of civilization presupposes the non-gratification (suppression, repression, or something
else?) of powerful instinctual urgencies. This cultural privation dominates the whole field of social relations
between human beings; we know already that it is the cause of the antagonism against which all civilization
has to fight. It sets hard tasks for our scientific work, too; we have a great deal to explain here. It is not easy
to understand how it can become possible to withhold satisfaction from an instinct. Nor is it by any means
without risk to do so; if the deprivation is not made good economically, one may be certain of producing
serious disorders.
13 Cf. WCharacter and Anal Erotismc (1908), Collected Papers, II; also numerous contributions to the subject by Ernest
Jones and others.
But now, if we wish to know what use it is to us to have recognized the evolution of culture as a special
process, comparable to the normal growth of an individual to maturity, we must clearly attack another
problem and put the question: What are the influences to which the evolution of culture owes its origin, how
did it arise, and what determined its course?-19-
IV
THIS task seems too big a one; one may well confess oneself diffident. Here follows what little I have been
able to elicit about it.
Once primitive man had made the discovery that it lay in his own handsHspeaking literally Hto improve
his lot on earth by working, it cannot have been a matter of indifference to him whether another man
worked with him or against him. The other acquired the value of a fellow-worker, and it was advantageous
to live with him. Even earlier, in his ape-like prehistory, man had adopted the habit of forming families: his
first helpers were probably themembers of his family. One may suppose that the founding of families was
in some way connected with the period when the need for genital satisfaction, no longer appearing like an
occasional guest who turns up suddenly and then vanishes without letting one hear anything of him for long
intervals, had settled down with each man like a permanent lodger. When this happened, the male acquired
a motive for keeping the female, or rather, his sexual objects, near him; while the female, who wanted not
to be separated from her helpless young, in their interests, too, had to stay by the stronger male. 14 In this
primitive family one essential feature of culture is lacking; the will of the father, the head of it, was
unfettered. I have endeavoured in Totem and Taboo to show how the way led from this family-life to the
succeeding phase of communal existence in the form of a band of brothers. By overpowering the father, the
sons had discovered that several men united can be stronger than a single man. The totemic stage of culture
is founded upon the restrictions that the band were obliged to impose on one another in order to maintain
the new system. These taboos were the first right or law. The life of human beings in common therefore had
a twofold foundation, i. e., the compulsion to work, created by external necessity, and the power of love,
causing the male to wish to keep his sexual object, the female, near him, and the female to keep near her that
part of herself which has become detached from her, her child. Eros and Ananke were the parents of human
culture, too. The first result of culture was that a larger number of human beings could then live together
in common. And since the two great powers were here cooperating together, one might have expected that
further cultural evolution would have proceeded smoothly towards even greater mastery over the external
world, as well as towards greater extension in the numbers of men sharing the life in common. Nor is it easy
to understand how this culture can be felt as anything but satisfying by those who partake of it.
14 The organic periodicity of the sexual process has persisted, it is true, but its effect on mental sexual excitation has
been almost reversed. This change is connected primarily with the diminishing importance of the olfactory stimuli
by means of which the menstrual process produced sexual excitement in the mind of the male. Their function was
taken over by visual stimuli, which could operate permanently, instead of intermittently like the olfactory ones. The
taboo of menstruation has its origin in this organic repression, which acted as a barrier against a phase of
development that had been surpassed; all its other motivations are probably of a secondary nature. (Cf. C. D. Daly,
)Hindumythologie und Kastrationskomplex, ) Imago, Vol. XIII, 1927. ) This process is repeated on a different level
when the gods of a foregone cultural epoch are changed into demons in the next. The diminution in importance of
olfactory stimuli seems itself, however, to be a consequence of manOs erecting himself from the earth, of his
adoption of an upright gait, which made his genitals, that before had been covered, visible and in need of protection
and so evoked feelings of shame. ManOs erect posture, therefore, would represent the beginning of the momentous
process of cultural evolution. The chain of development would run from this onward, through the diminution in
the importance of olfactory stimuli and the isolation of women at their periods, to a time when visual stimuli
became paramount, the genitals became visible, further till sexual excitation became constant and the family was
founded, and so to the threshold of human culture. This is only a theoretical speculation, but it is important enough
to be worth checking carefully by the conditions obtaining among the animals closely allied to man.
There is an unmistakable social factor at work in the impulse of civilization towards cleanliness, which has been
subsequently justified by considerations of hygiene but had nevertheless found expression before they were
appreciated. The impulse towards cleanliness originates in the striving to get rid of excretions which have become
unpleasant to the sense-perceptions. We know that things are different in the nursery. Excreta arouse no aversion
in children; they seem precious to them, as being parts of their own bodies which have been detached from them.
The training of children is very energetic in this particular; its object is to expedite the development that lies ahead
of them, according to which the excreta are to become worthless, disgusting, horrible, and despicable to them. Such
a reversal of values would be almost impossible to bring about, were it not that these substances expelled from the
body are destined by their strong odours to share the fate that overtook the olfactory stimuli after man had erected-20-
himself from the ground. Anal erotism, therefore, is from the first subjected to the organic repression which opened
up the way to culture. The social factor which has been active in the further modifications of anal erotism comes
into play with the fact that in spite of all manOs evolutionary progress the smell of his own excretions is scarcely
disagreeable to him yet, but so far only that of the evacuations of others. The man who is not clean, i. e.. who does
not eliminate his excretions, therefore offends others, shows no consideration for themea fact which is exemplified
in the commonest and most forcible terms of abuse. It would be incomprehensible, too, that man should use as an
abusive epithet the name of his most faithful friend in the animal world, if dogs did not incur the contempt of men
through two of their characteristics, i. e., that they are creatures of smell and have no horror of excrement, and,
secondly, that they are not ashamed of their sexual functions.
Before we go on to enquire where the disturbances in it arise, we will let ourselves digress from the point
that love was one of the founders of culture and so fill a gap left in our previous discussion. We said that
man, having found by experience that sexual (genital) love afforded him his greatest gratification, so that
it became in effect a prototype of all happiness to him. must have been thereby impelled to seek his
happiness further along the path of sexual relations, to make genital erotism the central point of his life. We
went on to say that in so doing he becomes to a very dangerous degree dependent on a part of the outer
world, namely, on his chosen love-object, and this exposes him to most painful sufferings if he is rejected
by it or loses it through death or defection. The wise men of all ages have consequently warned us
emphatically against this way of life; but in spite of all it retains its attraction for a great number of people.
A small minority are enabled by their constitution, nevertheless, to find happiness along the path of love;
but far-reaching mental transformations of the erotic function are necessary before this is possible. These
people make themselves independent of their object?s acquiescence by transferring the main value from the
fact of being loved to their own act of loving; they protect themselves against loss of it by attaching their love
not to individual objects but to all men equally, and they avoid the uncertainties and disappointments of
genital love by turning away from its sexual aim and modifying the instinct into an impulse with an inhibited
aim. The state which they induce in themselves by this processHan unchangeable, undeviating, tender
attitudeHhas little superficial likeness to the stormy vicissitudes of genital love, from which it is
nevertheless derived. It seems that Saint Francis of Assisi may have carried this method of using love to
produce an inner feeling of happiness as far as anyone; what we are thus characterizing as one of the
procedures by which the pleasure-principle fulfils itself has in fact been linked up in many ways with
religion; the connection between them may lie in those remote fastnesses of the mind where the distinctions
between the ego and objects, and between the various objects, become matters of indifference. From one
ethical standpoint, the deeper motivation of which will later become clear to us, this inclination towards an
all-embracing love of others and of the world at large is regarded as the highest state of mind of which man
is capable Even at this early stage in the discussion. I will not withhold the two principal objections we have
to raise against this view. A love that does not discriminate seems to us to lose some of its own value, since
it does an injustice to its object. And secondly, not all men are worthy of love.
The love that instituted the family still retains its power; in its original form it does not stop short of direct
sexual satisfaction, and in its modified form, as aim-inhibited friendliness, it influences our civilization. In
both these forms it carries on its task of binding men and women to one another, and it does this with
greater intensity than can be achieved through the interest of work in common. The casual and
undifferentiated way in which the word love is employed by language has its genetic justification. In general
usage, the relation between a man and a woman whose genital desires have led them to found a family is
called love; but the positive attitude of feeling between parents and children, between brothers and sisters
in a family, is also called love, although to us this relation merits the description of aim-inhibited love or
affection. Love with an inhibited aim was indeed originally full sensual love and in men?s unconscious minds
is so still. Both of them, the sensual and the aim-inhibited forms, reach out beyond the family and create new
bonds with others who before were strangers. Genital love leads to the forming of new families; aiminhibited
love to friendships, which are valuable culturally because they do not entail many of the limitations
of genital loveH for instance, its exclusiveness. But the interrelations between love and culture lose their
simplicity as development proceeds. On the one hand, love opposes the interests of culture; on the other,
culture menaces love with grievous restrictions.-21-
This rift between them seems inevitable; the cause of it is not immediately recognizable. It expresses itself
first in a conflict between the family and the larger community to which the individual belongs. We have
seen already that one of culture?s principal endeavours is to cement men and women together into larger
units. But the family will not give up the individual. The closer the attachment between the members of it,
the more they often tend to remain aloof from others, and the harder it is for them to enter into the wider
circle of the world at large. That form of life in common which is phylogenetically older, and is in childhood
its only form, resists being displaced by the type that becomes acquired later with culture. Detachment from
the family has become a task that awaits every adolescent, and often society helps him through it with
pubertal and initiatory rites. One gets the impression that these difficulties form an integral part of every
process of mental evolutionHand indeed, at bottom, of every organic development, too.
The next discord is caused by women, who soon become antithetical to cultural trends and spread around
them their conservative influenceHthe women who at the beginning laid the foundations of culture by the
appeal of their love. Women represent the interests of the family and sexual life; the work of civilization has
become more and more men?s business; it confronts them with ever harder tasks, compels them to
sublimations of instinct which women are not easily able to achieve. Since man has not an unlimited amount
of mental energy at his disposal, he must accomplish his tasks by distributing his libido to the best
advantage. What he employs for cultural purposes he withdraws to a great extent from women and his
sexual life; his constant association with men and his dependence on his relations with them even estrange
him from his duties as husband and father. Woman finds herself thus forced into the background by the
claims of culture, and she adopts an inimical attitude towards it.
The tendency of culture to set restrictions upon sexual life is no less evident than its other aim of widening
its sphere of operations. Even the earliest phase of it, the totemic, brought in its train the prohibition against
incestuous object-choice, perhaps the most maiming wound ever inflicted throughout the ages on the erotic
life of man. Further limitations are laid on it by taboos, laws, and customs, which touch men as well as
women. Various types of culture differ in the lengths to which they carry this; and the material structure of
the social fabric also affects the measure of sexual freedom that remains. We have seen that culture obeys
the laws of psychological economic necessity in making the restrictions, for it obtains a great part of the
mental energy it needs by subtracting it from sexuality. Culture behaves towards sexuality in this respect
like a tribe or a section of the population which has gained the upper hand and is exploiting the rest to its
own advantage. Fear of a revolt among the oppressed then becomes a motive, for even stricter regulations.
A high-water mark in this type of development has been reached in our Western European civilization.
Psychologically it is fully justified in beginning by censuring any manifestations of the sexual life of children,
for there would be no prospect of curbing the sexual desires of adults if the ground had not been prepared
for it in childhood. Nevertheless, there is no sort of justification for the lengths beyond this to which civilized
society goes in actually denying the existence of these manifestations, which are not merely demonstrable
but positively glaring. Where sexually mature persons are concerned, object-choice is further narrowed
down to the opposite sex and most of the extra-genital forms of satisfaction are interdicted as perversions.
The standard which declares itself in these prohibitions is that of a sexual life identical for all; it pays no heed
to the disparities in the inborn and acquired sexual constitutions of individuals and cuts off a considerable
number of them from sexual enjoyment, thus becoming a cause of grievous injustice. The effect of these
restrictive measures might presumably be that all the sexual interest of those who are normal and not
constitutionally handicapped could flow without further forfeiture into the channel left open to it. But the
only outlet not thus censured, heterosexual genital love, is further circumscribed by the barriers of
legitimacy and monogamy. Present-day civilization gives us plainly to understand that sexual relations are
permitted only on the basis of a final, indissoluble bond between a man and woman; that sexuality as a
source of enjoyment for its own sake is unacceptable to it; and that its intention is to tolerate it only as the
hitherto irreplaceable means of muliplying the human race.
This, of course, represents an extreme. Everyone knows that it has proved impossible to put it into execution,
even for short periods. Only the weaklings have submitted to such comprehensive interference with their
sexual freedom, and stronger natures have done so only under one compensatory condition, of which
mention may be made later. Civilized society has seen itself obliged to pass over in silence many-22-
transgressions which by its own ordinances it ought to have penalized. This does not justify anyone,
however, in leaning towards the other side and assuming that, because it does not achieve all it aims at, such
an attitude on the part of society is altogether harmless. The sexual life of civilized man is seriously disabled,
whatever we may say; it sometimes makes an impression of being a function in process of becoming
atrophied, just as organs like our teeth and our hair seem to be. One is probably right in supposing that the
importance of sexuality as a source of pleasurable sensations, i. e., as a means of fulfilling the purpose of life,
has perceptibly decreased. 15 Sometimes one imagines one perceives that it is not only the oppression of
culture, but something in the nature of the function itself that denies us full satisfaction and urges us in other
directions. This may be an error; it is hard to decide. 16
15 There is a short story, which I valued long ago, by a highly sensitive writer, the Englishman, John Galsworthy,
who today enjoys general recognition; it is called WThe Apple Tree. W It shows in a very moving and forcible way
how there is no longer any place in present-day civilized life for a simple natural love between two human beings.
16 The following considerations would support the view expressed above. Man, too, is an animal with an
unmistakably bisexual disposition. The individual represents a fusion of two symmetrical halves, of which,
according to many authorities, one is purely male, the other female. It is equally possible that each half was
originally hermaphroditic. Sex is a biological fact which is hard to evaluate psychologically, although it is of
extraordinary importance in mental life. We are accustomed to say that every human being displays both male and
female instinctual impulses, needs, and attributes, but the characteristics of what is male and female can only be
demonstrated in anatomy, and not in psychology. Where the latter is concerned, the antithesis of sex fades away into
that of activity and passivity, and we far too readily identify activity with masculinity and passivity with femininity,
a statement which is by no means universally confirmed in the animal world. The theory of bisexuality is still very
obscure, and in psycho-analysis we must be painfully aware of the disadvantage we are under as long as it still
remains unconnected with the theory of instincts. However this may be, if we assume it to be a fact that each
individual has both male and female desires which need satisfaction in his sexual life, we shall be prepared for the
possibility that these needs will not both be gratified on the same object, and that they will interfere with each other,
if they cannot be kept apart so that each impulse flows into a special channel suited for it. Another difficulty arises
from the circumstance that so often a measure of direct aggressiveness is coupled with an erotic relationship, over
and above its inherent sadistic components. The love-object does not always view these complications with the
degree of understanding and tolerance manifested by the peasant woman who complained that her husband did
not love her any more, because he had not beaten her for a week.
The conjecture which leads furthest, however, is that eand here we come back to the remarks in footnote 14ethe
whole of sexuality, and not merely anal erotism, is threatened with falling a victim to the organic repression
consequent upon manOs adoption of the erect posture and the lowering in value of the sense of smell; so that since
that time the sexual function has been associated with a resistance not susceptible of further explanation, which puts
obstacles in the way of full satisfaction and forces it away from its sexual aim towards sublimations and
displacements of libido. I am aware that Bleuler (in )Der Sexual-widerstand, ) Jahrbuch fur psychoanalytische und
psy-chopathologische Forschungen, Vol. V, 1913) once pointed out the existence of a fundamental tendency of this
kind towards rejecting sexual life. All neurotics, and many others too, take exception to the fact that inter urinas et
faeces nascimur [We are born among urine and faeces]. The genitals, too, excite the olfactory sense strongly in a way
that many people cannot tolerate and which spoils sexual intercourse for them. Thus we should find, as the deepest
root of the sexual repression that marches with culture, the organic defence of the new form of life that began with
the erect posture against the earliest type of animal existencee-a result of scientific researches that coincides in a
curious way with often expressed vulgar prejudices. At the present time, nevertheless, these results are but
unconfirmed possibilities, not yet scientifically substantiated. Nor should we forget that, in spite of the undeniable
diminution in the importance of olfactory stimuli, there exist even in Europe races who prize highly as aphrodisiacs
the strong genital odours so objectionable to us and who will not renounce them. (Cf. the reports of folkloristic
information obtained by Iwan BlochOs WQuestionnaire. W appearing under the title of )Uber den Geruchssinn in der
vita sexualisS in various volumes of Friedrich S. KraussO Anthropophyteia. )-23-
V
PSYCHO-ANALYTIC work has shown that these frustrations in respect of sexual life are especially
unendurable to the so-called neurotics among us. These persons manufacture substitute-gratifications for
themselves in their symptoms, which, however, are either painful in themselves or become the cause of
suffering owing to the difficulties they create with the person?s environment and society at large. It is easy
to understand the latter fact, but the former presents us with a new problem. But culture demands other
sacrifices besides that of sexual gratifications.
We have regarded the difficulties in the development of civilization as part of the general difficulty
accompanying all evolution, for we have traced them to the inertia of libido, its disinclination to relinquish
an old position in favour of a new one. It is much the same thing if we say that the conflict between
civilization and sexuality is caused by the circumstance that sexual love is a relationship between two
people, in which a third can only be superfluous or disturbing, whereas civilization is founded on relations
between larger groups of persons. When a love-relationship is at its height, no room is left for any interest
in the surrounding world; the pair of lovers are sufficient unto themselves, do not even need the child they
have in common to make them happy. In no other case does Eros so plainly betray the core of his being, his
aim of making one out of many; but when he has achieved it in the proverbial way through the love of two
human beings, he is not willing to go further.
From all this we might well imagine that a civilized community could consist of pairs of individuals such
as this, libidinally satisfied in each other, and linked to all the others by work and common interests. If this
were so, culture would not need to levy energy from sexuality. But such a desirable state of things does not
exist and never has existed; in actuality, culture is not content with such limited ties as these; we see that it
endeavours to bind the members of the community to one another by libidinal ties as well, that it makes use
of every means and favours every avenue by which powerful identifications can be created among them,
and that it exacts a heavy toll of aim-inhibited libido in order to strengthen communities by bonds of
friendship between the members. Restrictions upon sexual life are unavoidable if this object is to be attained.
But we cannot see the necessity that forces culture along this path and gives rise to its antagonism to
sexuality. It must be due to some disturbing influence not yet detected by us.
We may find the clue in one of the so-called ideal standards of civilized society. It runs: CThou shalt love thy
neighbour as thyself. C It is world-renowned, undoubtedly older than Christianity which parades it as its
proudest profession, yet certainly not very old; in historical times, men still knew nothing of it. We will
adopt a naive attitude towards it, as if we were meeting it for the first time. Thereupon, we find ourselves
unable to suppress a feeling of astonishment, as at something unnatural. Why should we do this? What good
is it to us? Above all, how can we do such a thing? How could it possibly be done? My love seems to me
a valuable thing that I have no right to throw away without reflection. It imposes obligations on me
which I must be prepared to make sacrifices to fulfil. If I love someone, he must be worthy of it in some way
or other. (I am leaving out of account now the use he may be to me. as well as his possible significance to
me as a sexual object; neither of these two kinds of relationship between us come into question where the
injunction to love my neighbour is concerned. ) He will be worthy of it if he is so like me in important
respects that I can love myself in him; worthy of it if he is so much more perfect than I that I can love my
ideal of myself in him; I must love him if he is the son of my friend, since the pain my friend would feel if
anything untoward happened to him would be my painHI should have to share it. But if he is a stranger
to me and cannot attract me by any value he has in himself or any significance he may have already acquired
in my emotional life, it will be hard for me to love him. I shall even be doing wrong if I do, for my love is
valued as a privilege by all those belonging to me; it is an injustice to them if I put a stranger on a level with
them. But if I am to love him (with that kind of universal love) simply because he, too, is a denizen of the
earth, like an insect or an earthworm or a grass-snake, then I fear that but a small modicum of love will fall
to his lot and it would be impossible for me to give him as much as by all the laws of reason I am entitled
to retain for myself. What is the point of an injunction promulgated with such solemnity, if reason does not
recommend it to us?-24-
When I look more closely. I find still further difficulties. Not merely is this stranger on the whole not worthy
of love, but, to be honest, I must confess he has more claim to my hostility, even to my hatred. He does not
seem to have the least trace of love for me, does not show me the slightest consideration. If it will do him
any good, he has no hesitation in injuring me, never even asking himself whether the amount of advantage
he gains by it bears any proportion to the amount of wrong done to me. What is more, he does not even need
to get an advantage from it; if he can merely get a little pleasure out of it, he thinks nothing of jeering at me,
insulting me, slandering me, showing his power over me; and the more secure he feels himself, or the more
helpless I am, with so much more certainty can I expect this behaviour from him towards me. If he behaved
differently, if he showed me consideration and did not molest me, I should in any case, without the aforesaid
commandment, be willing to treat him similarly. If the high-sounding ordinance had run: CLove thy
neighbour as thy neighbour loves thee, C I should not take objection to it. And there is a second
commandment that seems to me even more incomprehensible, and arouses still stronger opposition in me.
It is: CLove thine enemies. C When I think it over, however, I am wrong in treating it as a greater imposition.
It is at bottom the same thing. 17
17 A great poet may permit himself, at least in jest, to give utterance to psychological truths that are heavily
censured. Thus Heine: WMine is the most peaceable disposition. My wishes are a humble dwelling with a thatched
roof, but a good bed, good food, milk and butter of the freshest, flowers at my windows, some fine tall trees before
my door; and if the good God wants to make me completely happy, he will grant me the joy of seeing some six or
seven of my enemies hanging from these trees. With my heart full of deep emotion I shall forgive them before they
die all the wrong they did me in their lifetimeetrue, one must forgive oneOs enemies, but not until they are brought
to execution. WeHeine, Gedanken und Einfalle.
I imagine now I hear a voice gravely adjuring me: CJust because thy neighbour is not worthy of thy love, is
probably full of enmity towards thee, thou shouldst love him as thyself. C I then perceive the case to be like
that of Credo, quid absurdum. 18
18 I believe it, because it is absurd.
Now it is, of course, very probable that my neighbour, when he is commanded to love me as himself, will
answer exactly as I have done and reject me for the same reasons. I hope he will not have the same objective
grounds for doing so, but he will hope so as well. Even so, there are variations in men?s behaviour which
ethics, disregarding the fact that they are determined, classifies as good and evil. As long as these undeniable
variations have not been abolished, conformity to the highest ethical standards constitutes a betrayal of the
interests of culture, for it puts a direct premium on wickedness. One is irresistibly reminded here of an
incident in the French Chamber when capital punishment was being discussed; the speech of a member who
had passionately supported its abolition was being applauded with loud acclamation, when suddenly a
voice was heard calling out from the back of the room, IQue messieurs les assassins commencent!K 19
19 Let the murderers begin!
The bit of truth behind all thisHone so eagerly deniedHis that men are not gentle, friendly creatures
wishing for love, who simply defend themselves if they are attacked, but that a powerful measure of desire
for aggression has to be reckoned as part of their instinctual endowment. The result is that their neighbour
is to them not only a possible helper or sexual object, but also a temptation to them to gratify their
aggressiveness on him, to exploit his capacity for work without recompense, to use him sexually without
his consent, to seize his possessions, to humiliate him, to cause him pain, to torture and kill him. Homo
homini lupus; 20 who has the courage to dispute it in the face of all the evidence in his own life and in history?
This aggressive cruelty usually lies in wait for some provocation, or else it steps into the service of some
other purpose, the aim of which might as well have been achieved by milder measures. In circumstances
that favour it, when those forces in the mind which ordinarily inhibit it cease to operate, it also manifests
itself spontaneously and reveals men as savage beasts to whom the thought of sparing their own kind is
alien. Anyone who calls to mind the atrocities of the early migrations, of the invasion by the Huns, or by the
so-called Mongols under Jenghiz Khan and Tamurlane, of the sack of Jerusalem by the pious Crusaders,-25-
even indeed the horrors of the last World War, will have to bow his head humbly before the truth of this
view of man.
20 Man is to man a wolf.
The existence of this tendency to aggression which we can detect in ourselves and rightly presume to be
present in others is the factor that disturbs our relations with our neighbours and makes it necessary for
culture to institute its high demands. Civilized society is perpetually menaced with disintegration through
this primary hostility of men towards one another. Their interests in their common work would not hold
them together; the passions of instinct are stronger than reasoned interests. Culture has to call up every
possible reinforcement in order to erect barriers against the aggressive instincts of men and hold their
manifestations in check by reaction-formations in men?s minds. Hence its system of methods by which
mankind is to be driven to identifications and aim-inhibited love-relationships; hence the restrictions on
sexual life; and hence, too. its ideal command to love one?s neighbour as oneself, which is really justified by
the fact that nothing is so completely at variance with original human nature as this. With all its striving,
this endeavour of culture?s has so far not achieved very much. Civilization expects to prevent the worst
atrocities of brutal violence by taking upon itself the right to employ violence against criminals, but the law
is not able to lay hands on the more discreet and subtle forms in which human aggressions are expressed.
The time comes when every one of us has to abandon the illusory anticipations with which in our youth we
regarded our fellow-men, and when we realize how much hardship and suffering we have been caused in
life through their ill-will. It would be unfair, however, to reproach culture with trying to eliminate all
disputes and competition from human concerns. These things are undoubtedly indispensable; but
opposition is not necessarily enmity, only it may be misused to make an opening for it.
The Communists believe they have found a way of delivering us from this evil. Man is whole-heartedly
good and friendly to his neighbour, they say, but the system of private property has corrupted his nature.
The possession of private property gives power to the individual and thence the temptation arises to ill-treat
his neighbour; the man who is excluded from the possession of property is obliged to rebel in hostility
against the oppressor. If private property were abolished, all valuables held in common and all allowed to
share in the enjoyment of them, ill-will and enmity would disappear from among men. Since all needs
would be satisfied, none would have any reason to regard another as an enemy; all would willingly
undertake the work which is necessary. I have no concern with any economic criticisms of the communistic
system; 1 cannot enquire into whether the abolition of private property is advantageous and expedient. 21
But I am able to recognize that psychologically it is founded on an untenable illusion. By abolishing private
property one deprives the human love of aggression of one of its instruments, a strong one undoubtedly,
but assuredly not the strongest. It in no way alters the individual differences in power and influence which
are turned by aggressiveness to its own use, nor does it change the nature of the instinct in any way. This
instinct did not arise as the result of property; it reigned almost supreme in primitive times when
possessions were still extremely scanty; it shows itself already in the nursery when possessions have hardly
grown out of their original anal shape; it is at the bottom of all the relations of affection and love between
human beingsHpossibly with the single exception of that of a mother to her male child. Suppose that
personal rights to material goods are done away with, there still remain prerogatives in sexual relationships,
which must arouse the strongest rancour and most violent enmity among men and women who are
otherwise equal. Let us suppose this were also to be removed by instituting complete liberty in sexual life,
so that the family, the germ-cell of culture, ceased to exist; one could not. it is true, foresee the new paths
on which cultural development might then proceed, but one thing one would be bound to expect and that
is that the ineffaceable feature of human nature would follow wherever it led.
21 Anyone who has been through the misery of poverty in his youth, and has endured the indifference and
arrogance of those who have possessions, should be exempt from the suspicion that he has no understanding of or
goodwill towards the endeavours made to fight the economic inequality of men and all that it leads to. To be sure,
if an attempt is made to base this fight upon an abstract demand for equality for all in the name of justice, there is
a very obvious objection to be made, namely, that nature began the injustice by the highly unequal way in which
she endows individuals physically and mentally, for which there is no help.-26-
Men clearly do not find it easy to do without satisfaction of this tendency to aggression that is in them; when
deprived of satisfaction of it they are ill at ease. There is an advantage, not to be undervalued, in the
existence of smaller communities, through which the aggressive instinct can find an outlet in enmity towards
those outside the group. It is always possible to unite considerable numbers of men in love towards one
another, so long as there are still some remaining as objects for aggressive manifestations. I once interested
myself in the peculiar fact that peoples whose territories are adjacent, and are otherwise closely related, are
always at feud with and ridiculing each other, as. for instance, the Spaniards and the Portuguese, the North
and South Germans, the English and the Scotch, and so on. I gave it the name of narcissism in respect of minor
differences, which does not do much to explain it. One can now see that it is a convenient and relatively
harmless form of satisfaction for aggressive tendencies, through which cohesion amongst the members of
a group is made easier. The Jewish people, scattered in all directions as they are. have in this way rendered
services which deserve recognition to the development of culture in the countries where they settled; but
unfortunately not all the massacres of Jews in the Middle Ages sufficed to procure peace and security for
their Christian contemporaries. Once the apostle Paul had laid down universal love between all men as the
foundation of his Christian community, the inevitable consequence in Christianity was the utmost
intolerance towards all who remained outside of it; the Romans, who had not founded their state on love,
were not given to lack of religious toleration, although religion was a concern of the state and the state was
permeated through and through with it. Neither was it an unaccountable chance that the dream of a German
world-dominion evoked a complementary movement towards anti-semitism; and it is quite intelligible that
the attempt to establish a new communistic type of culture in Russia should find psychological support in
the persecution of the bourgeois. One only wonders, with some concern, however, how the Soviets will
manage when they have exterminated their bourgeois entirely.
If civilization requires such sacrifices, not only of sexuality but also of the aggressive tendencies in mankind,
we can better understand why it should be so hard for men to feel happy in it. In actual fact, primitive man
was better off in this respect, for he knew nothing of any restrictions on his instincts. As a set-off against this,
his prospects of enjoying his happiness for any length of time were very slight. Civilized man has exchanged
some part of his chances of happiness for a measure of security. We will not forget, however, that in the
primal family only the head of it enjoyed this instinctual freedom; the other members lived in slavish
thraldom. The antithesis between a minority enjoying cultural advantages and a majority who are robbed
of them was therefore most extreme in that primeval period of culture. With regard to the primitive human
types living at the present time, careful investigation has revealed that their instinctual life is by no means
to be envied on account of its freedom; it is subject to restrictions of a different kind but perhaps even more
rigorous than is that of modern civilized man.
In rightly finding fault, as we thus do, with our present state of civilization for so inadequately providing
us with what we require to make us happy in life, and for the amount of suffering of a probably avoidable
nature it lays us open toHin doing our utmost to lay bare the roots of its deficiencies by our unsparing
criticisms, we are undoubtedly exercising our just rights and not showing ourselves enemies of culture. We
may expect that in the course of time changes will be carried out in our civilization so that it becomes more
satisfying to our needs and no longer open to the reproaches we have made against it. But perhaps we shall
also accustom ourselves to the idea that there are certain difficulties inherent in the very nature of culture
which will not yield to any efforts at reform. Over and above the obligations of putting restrictions upon our
instincts, which we see to be inevitable, we are imminently threatened with the dangers of a state one may
call la misere psychologique of groups. This danger is most menacing where the social forces of cohesion
consist predominantly of identifications of the individuals in the group with one another, whilst leading
personalities fail to acquire the significance that should fall to them in the process of group-formation. 22
The state of civilization in America at the present day offers a good opportunity for studying this injurious
effect of civilization which we have reason to dread. But I will resist the temptation to enter upon a criticism
of American culture; I have no desire to give the impression that I would employ American methods
myself.
22 Cf. Group Psychology and Analysis of the Ego.-27-
VI
NEVER before in any of my previous writings have I had the feeling so strongly as I have now that what
I am describing is common knowledge, that I am requisitioning paper and ink, and in due course the labour
of compositors and printers, in order to expound things that in themselves are obvious. For this reason, if
it should appear that the recognition of a special independent instinct of aggression would entail a
modification of the psycho-analytical theory of instincts, I should be glad enough to seize upon the idea.
We shall see that this is not so, that it is merely a matter of coming to closer quarters with a conclusion to
which we long ago committed ourselves and following it out to its logical consequences. The whole of
analytic theory has evolved gradually enough, but the theory of instincts has groped its way forward under
greater difficulties than any other part of it. And yet a theory of instincts was so indispensable for the rest
that something had to be adopted in place of it. In my utter perplexity at the beginning, I took as my
starting-point the poet-philosopher Schiller?s aphorism that hunger and love make the world go round.
Hunger would serve to represent those instincts which aim at preservation of the individual; love seeks for
objects: its chief function, which is favoured in every way by nature, is preservation of the species. Thus first
arose the contrast between ego instincts and object instincts. For the energy of the latter instincts, and
exclusively for them, I introduced the term libido; an antithesis was thus formed between the ego instincts
and the libidinal instincts directed towards objects, i. e., love in its widest sense. One of these object instincts,
the sadistic, certainly stood out from the rest in that its aim was so very unloving; moreover, it clearly allied
itself in many of its aspects with the ego instincts, and its close kinship with instincts of mastery without any
libidinal purpose could not be concealed, but these ambiguities could be overcome; in spite of them, sadism
plainly belonged to sexual lifeHthe game of cruelty could take the place of the game of love. Neurosis
appeared as the outcome of a struggle between the interests of self-preservation and the claims of libido, a
struggle in which the ego was victorious, but at the price of great suffering and renunciations.
Every analyst will admit that none of this even now reads like a statement long since recognized as
erroneous. All the same, modifications had to be made as our researches advanced from the repressed to
the repressing, from the object instincts to the ego. A cardinal point in this advance was the introduction of
the concept of narcissism, i. e.. the idea that libido cathects the ego itself, that its first dwelling-place was in
the ego, and that the latter remains to some extent its permanent headquarters. This narcissistic libido turns
in the direction of objects, thus becoming object-libido, and can transform itself back into narcissistic libido.
The concept of narcissism made it possible to consider the traumaticneuroses, as well as many diseases
bordering on the psychoses, and also the latter themselves, from the psycho-analytic angle. It was not
necessary to abandon the view that the transference-neuroses are attempts on the part of the ego to guard
itself against sexuality, but the concept of the libido was jeopardized. Since the ego-instincts were found to
be libidinal as well, it seemed for a time inevitable that libido should become synonymous with instinctual
energy in general, as C. G. Jung had previously advocated. Yet there still remained in me a kind of
conviction, for which as yet there were no grounds, that the instincts could not all be of the same nature. I
made the next step in Beyond the Pleasure Principle (1920), when the repetition-compulsion and the
conservative character of instinctual life first struck me. On the basis of speculations concerning the origin
of life and of biological parallels, I drew the conclusion that, beside the instinct preserving the organic
substance and binding it into ever larger units, 23 there must exist another in antithesis to this, which
would seek to dissolve these units and reinstate their antecedent inorganic state. That is to say, a death
instinct as well as Eros; the phenomena of life would then be explicable from the interplay of the two and
their counteracting effects on each other. It was not easy, however, to demonstrate the working of this
hypothetical death instinct. The manifestations of Eros were conspicuous and audible enough; one might
assume that the death instinct worked silently within the organism towards its disintegration, but that, of
course, was no proof. The idea that part of the instinct became directed towards the outer world and then
showed itself as an instinct of aggression and destruction carried us a step further. The instinct would thus
itself have been pressed into the service of Eros, in that the organism would be destroying something
animate or inanimate outside itself instead of itself. Conversely, any cessation of this flow outwards must
have the effect of intensifying the self-destruction which in any case would always be going on within. From
this example one could then surmise that the two kinds of instincts seldomHperhaps neverHappear in-28-
isolation, but always mingle with each other in different, very varying proportions, and so make
themselves unrecognizable to us. Sadism, long since known to us as a component-instinct of sexuality,
would represent a particularly strong admixture of the instinct of destruction into the love impulse; while
its counterpart, masochism, would be an alliance between sexuality and the destruction at work within the
self, in consequence of which the otherwise imperceptible destructive trend became directly evident and
palpable.
23 The contradiction between the tireless tendency of Eros to spread ever further and the general conservative nature
of the instincts here becomes very noticeable; it would serve as the starting-point of enquiries into further problems.
The assumption of the existence of a death instinct or a destruction instinct has roused opposition even in
analytical circles; I know that there is a great tendency to ascribe all that is dangerous and hostile in love
rather to a fundamental bipolarity in its own nature. The conceptions I have summarized here I first put
forward only tentatively, but in the course of time they have won such a hold over me that I can no longer
think in any other way. To my mind they are theoretically far more fruitful than any others it is possible to
employ; they provide us with that simplification, without either ignoring or doing violence to the facts,
which is what we strive after in scientific work. I know that we have always had before our eyes
manifestations of the destruction instinct fused with erotism, directed outwards and inwards in sadism and
masochism; but I can no longer understand how we could have overlooked the universality of non-erotic
aggression and destruction, and could have omitted to give it its due significance in our interpretation of
life. (It is true that the destructive trend that is directed inwards, when it is not erotically tinged, usually
eludes our perceptions. ) I can remember my own defensive attitude when the idea of an instinct of
destruction first made its appearance in psycho-analytical literature and how long it took until I became
accessible to it. That others should have shown the same resistance, and still show it, surprises me less.
Those who love fairy-tales do not like it when people speak of the innate tendencies in mankind towards
aggression, destruction, and. in addition, cruelty. For God has made them in his own image, with his own
perfections; no one wants to be reminded how hard it is to reconcile the undeniable existenceHin spite of
all the protestations of Christian ScienceHof evil with His omnipotence and supreme goodness. The devil
is, in fact, the best way out in acquittal of God; he can be used to play the same economic role of outlet as
Jews in the world of Aryan ideals. But even so, one can just as well hold God responsible for the existence
of the devil as for the evil he personifies. In view of these difficulties, it is expedient for every man to make
humble obeisance on suitable occasions in honour of the high-minded nature of men; it will assist him to
become universally beloved and much shall be forgiven unto him on account of it. 24
24 In GoetheOs Mephistopheles we have a quite exceptionally striking identification of the principle of evil with
the instinct of destruction:
All entities that be Deserve their endenonentity.
So all that you name sin, destructione
Wickedness, brieflyeproves to be
The native element for me.
As his adversary, the devil himself cites not what is holy and good, but the power in nature working towards the
creation and renewal of lifeethat is, Eros.
From air, from water, germs in thousands,
As from the soil, break forth, break free,
Dry, wet, warm, coldUa pullulation!
Had I not laid on flame a reservation,
Nothing were set apart for me.
The name libido can again be used to denote the manifestations of the power of Eros in contradistinction to
the energy of the death instinct. 25 We must confess that it is more difficult for us to detect the latter, and
to a great extent we can merely conjecture its existence as a background to Eros, also that it eludes us
wherever it is not betrayed by a fusion with Eros. In sadism, where it bends the erotic aim to its own will-29-
and yet at the same time gratifies the sexual craving completely, we can obtain the clearest insight into its
nature and its relation to Eros. But even where it shows itself without any sexual purpose, even in the
blindest frenzy of destructiveness, one cannot ignore the fact that satisfaction of it is accompanied by an
extraordinarily intense narcissistic enjoyment, due to the fulfilment it brings to the ego of its oldest
omnipotence-wishes. The instinct of destruction, when tempered and harnessed (as it were, inhibited in its
aim) and directed towards objects, is compelled to provide the ego with satisfaction of its needs and with
power over nature. Since the assumption of its existence is based essentially on theoretical grounds, it must
be confessed that it is not entirely proof against theoretical objections. But this is how things appear to us
now in the present state of our knowledge; future research and reflection will undoubtedly bring further
light which will decide the question.
25 Our present point of view can be roughly expressed in the statement that libido participates in every instinctual
manifestation, but that not everything in that manifestation is libido.
In all that follows, I take up the standpoint that the tendency to aggression is an innate, independent,
instinctual disposition in man, and I come back now to the statement that it constitutes the most powerful
obstacle to culture. At one point in the course of this discussion, the idea took possession of us that culture
was a peculiar process passing over human life and we are still under the influence of this idea We may add
to this that the process proves to be in the service of Eros, which aims at binding together single human
individuals, then families, then tribes, races, nations, into one great unity, that of humanity. Why this has
to be done we do not know; it is simply the work of Eros. These masses of men must be bound to one
another libidinally; necessity alone, the advantages of common work, would not hold them together. The
natural instinct of aggressiveness in man, the hostility of each one against all and of all against each one.
opposes this program of civilization. This instinct of aggression is the derivative and main representative
of the death instinct we have found alongside of Eros, sharing his rule over the earth. And now, it seems to
me, the meaning of the evolution of culture is no longer a riddle to us. It must present to us the struggle
between Eros and death, between the instincts of life and the instincts of destruction, as it works itself out
in the human species. This struggle is what all life essentially consists of and so the evolution of civilization
may be simply described as the struggle of the human species for existence. 26 And it is this battle of the
Titans that our nurses and governesses try to compose with their lullaby-song of Heaven!
26 And we may probably add more precisely that its form was necessarily determined after some definite event
which still remains to be discovered.-30-
VII
WHY do the animals, kin to ourselves, not manifest any such cultural struggle? Oh, we don?t know. Very
probably certain of them, bees, ants, termites, had to strive for thousands of centuries before they found the
way to those state institutions, that division of functions, those restrictions upon individuals, which we
admire them for today. It is characteristic of our present state that we know by our own feelings that we
should not think ourselves happy in any of these communities of the animal world, or in any of the roles
they delegate to individuals. With other animal species it may be that a temporary deadlock has been
reached between the influences of their environment and the instincts contending within them, so that a
cessation of development has taken place. In primitive man, a fresh access of libido may have kindled a new
spurt of energy on the part of the instinct of destruction. There are a great many questions in all this to which
as yet we have no answer.
Another question concerns us more closely now. What means does civilization make use of to hold in check
the aggressiveness that opposes it, to make it harmless, perhaps to get rid of it? Some of these measures we
have already come to know, though not yet the one that is apparently the most important. We can study it
in the evolution of the individual. What happens in him to render his craving for aggression innocuous?
Something very curious, that we should never have guessed and that yet seems simple enough. The
aggressiveness is introjected, internalized; in fact, it is sent back where it came from, i. e., directed against the
ego. It is there taken over by a part of the ego that distinguishes itself from the rest as a super-ego, and now,
in the form of conscience, exercises the same propensity to harsh aggressiveness against the ego that the ego
would have liked to enjoy against others. The tension between the strict super-ego and the subordinate ego
we call the sense of guilt; it manifests itself as the need for punishment. Civilization, therefore, obtains the
mastery over the dangerous love of aggression in individuals by enfeebling and disarming it and setting up
an institution within their minds to keep watch over it, like a garrison in a conquered city.
As to the origin of the sense of guilt, analysts have different views from those of the psychologists; nor is
it easy for analysts to explain it either. First of all, when one asks how a sense of guilt arises in anyone, one
is told something one cannot dispute: people feel guilty (pious people call it CsinfulF) when they have done
something they know to be bad. But then one sees how little this answer tells one. Perhaps, after some
hesitation, one will add that a person who has not actually committed a bad act, but has merely become
aware of the intention to do so, can also hold himself guilty; and then one will ask why in this case the
intention is counted as equivalent to the deed. In both cases, however, one is presupposing that wickedness
has already been recognized as reprehensible, as something that ought not to be put into execution. How
is this judgment arrived at? One may reject the suggestion of an originalHas one might say,
naturalHcapacity for discriminating between good and evil. Evil is often not at all that which would injure
or endanger the ego; on the contrary, it can also be something that it desires, that would give it pleasure. An
extraneous influence is evidently at work; it is this that decides what is to be called good and bad. Since their
own feelings would not have led men along the same path, they must have had a motive for obeying this
extraneous influence. It is easy to discover this motive in man?s helplessness and dependence upon others,
it can best be designated the dread of losing love. If he loses the love of others on whom he is dependent, he
will forfeit also their protection against many dangers, and above all he runs the risk that this stronger
person will show his superiority in the form of punishing him. What is bad is, therefore, to begin with,
whatever causes one to be threatened with a loss of love; because of the dread of this loss, one must desist
from it. That is why it makes little difference whether one has already committed the bad deed or only
intends to do so; in either case the danger begins only when the authority has found it out, and the latter
would behave in the same way in both cases.
We call this state of mind a bad conscience but actually it does not deserve this name, for at this stage the
sense of guilt is obviously only the dread of losing love, social anxiety. In a little child it can never be
anything else, but in many adults too it has only changed in so far as the larger human community takes the
place of the father or of both parents. Consequently, such people habitually permit themselves to do any bad
deed that procures them something they want, if only they are sure that no authority will discover it or make-31-
them suffer for it; their anxiety relates only to the possibility of detection. 27 Present-day society has to take
into account the prevalence of this state of mind.
27 One is reminded of RousseauOs famous mandarin!
A great change takes place as soon as the authority has been internalized by the development of a super-ego.
The manifestations of conscience are then raised to a new level; to be accurate, one should not call them
conscience and sense of guilt before this. 28 At this point the dread of discovery ceases to operate and also
once for all any difference between doing evil and wishing to do it, since nothing is hidden from the superego,
not even thoughts. The real seriousness of the situation has vanished, it is true: for the new authority,
the super-ego, has no motive, as far as we know, for ill-treating the ego with which it is itself closely bound
up. But the influence of the genetic derivation of these things, which causes what has been outlived and
surmounted to be re-lived, manifests itself so that on the whole things remain as they were at the beginning.
The super-ego torments the sinful ego with the same feelings of dread and watches for opportunities
whereby the outer world can be made to punish it.
28 Every reasonable person will understand and take into account that in this descriptive survey things that in
reality occur by gradual transitions are sharply differentiated and that the mere existence of a super-ego is not the
only factor concerned, but also its relative strength and sphere of influence. All that has been said above in regard
to conscience and guilt, moreover, is common knowledge and practically undisputed.
At this second stage of development, conscience exhibits a peculiarity which was absent in the first and is
not very easy to account for. That is, the more righteous a man is, the stricter and more suspicious will his
conscience be, so that ultimately it is precisely those people who have carried holiness farthest who reproach
themselves with the deepest sinfulness. This means that virtue forfeits some of her promised reward; the
submissive and abstemious ego does not enjoy the trust and confidence of its mentor, and, as it seems,
strives in vain to earn it. Now, to this some people will be ready to object that these difficulties are
artificialities. A relatively strict and vigilant conscience is the very sign of a virtuous man, and though saints
may proclaim themselves sinners, they are not so wrong, in view of the temptations of instinctual
gratifications to which they are peculiarly liableHsince, as we know, temptations do but increase under
constant privation, whereas they subside, at any rate temporarily, if they are sometimes gratified. The field
of ethics is rich in problems, and another of the facts we find here is that misfortune, i.e., external
deprivation, greatly intensifies the strength of conscience in the super-ego. As long as things go well with
a man, his conscience is lenient and lets the ego do all kinds of things; when some calamity befalls, he holds
an inquisition within, discovers his sin, heightens the standards of his conscience, imposes abstinences on
himself and punishes himself with penances. 29 Whole peoples have acted in this way and still do so. But
this is easily explained from the original infantile stage of conscience which, as we thus see, is not
abandoned after the introjection into the super-ego, but persists alongside and behind the latter. Fate is felt
to be a substitute for the agency of the parents: adversity means that one is no longer loved by this highest
power of all, and, threatened by this loss of love, one humbles oneself again before the representative of the
parents in the super-ego which in happier days one had tried to disregard. This becomes especially clear
when destiny is looked upon in the strictly religious sense as the expression of God?s will and nothing else.
The people of Israel believed themselves to be God?s favourite children, and when the great Father hurled
visitation after visitation upon them, it still never shook them in this belief or caused them to doubt His
power and His justice; they proceeded instead to bring their prophets into the world to declare their
sinfulness to them and out of their sense of guilt they constructed the stringent commandments of their
priestly religion. It is curious how differently a savage behaves! If he has had bad fortune, he does not throw
the blame on himself, but on his fetish, who has plainly not done his duty by him, and he belabours it
instead of punishing himself.
29 This increased sensitivity of morals in consequence of ill-luck has been illustrated by Mark Twain in a delicious
little story: The First Melon I ever Stole. This melon, as it happened, was unripe. I heard Mark Twain tell the story
himself in one of his lectures. After he had given out the title, he stopped and asked himself in a doubtful way:
WWas it the first?c This was the whole story.-32-
Hence we know of two sources for feelings of guilt: that arising from the dread of authority and the later
one from the dread of the superego. The first one compels us to renounce instinctual gratification; the other
presses over and above this towards punishment, since the persistence of forbidden wishes cannot be
concealed from the super-ego. We have also heard how the severity of the super-ego, the rigour of
conscience, is to be explained. It simply carries on the severity of external authority which it has succeeded
and to some extent replaced. We see now how renunciation of instinctual gratification is related to the sense
of guilt. Originally, it is true, renunciation is the consequence of a dread of external authority; one gives up
pleasures so as not to lose its love. Having made this renunciation, one is quits with authority, so to speak;
no feeling of guilt should remain. But with the dread of the superego the case is different. Renunciation of
gratification does not suffice here, for the wish persists and is not capable of being hidden from the superego.
In spite of the renunciations made, feelings of guilt will be experienced and this is a great disadvantage
economically of the erection of the super-ego, or, as one may say,of the formation of conscience.
Renunciation no longer has a completely absolving effect; virtuous restraint is no longer rewarded by the
assurance of love; a threatened external unhappinessHloss of love and punishment meted out by external
authorityHhas been exchanged for a lasting inner unhappiness, the tension of a sense of guilt.
These inter-relations are so complicated and at the same time so important that, in spite of the dangers of
repetition, I will consider them again from another angle. The chronological sequence would thus be as
follows: first, instinct-renunciation due to dread of an aggression by external authorityHthis is, of course,
tantamount to the dread of loss of love, for love is a protection against these punitive aggressions. Then
follows the erection of an internal authority, and instinctual renunciation due to dread of itHthat is, dread
of conscience. In the second case, there is the equivalence of wicked acts and wicked intentions; hence comes
the sense of guilt, the need for punishment. The aggressiveness of conscience carries on the aggressiveness
of authority. Thus far all seems to be clear; but how can we find a place in this scheme for the effect
produced by misfortune (i. e.. renunciations externally imposed), for the effect it has of increasing the rigour
of conscience? How account for the exceptional stringency of conscience in the best men, those least given
to rebel against it? We have already explained both these peculiarities of conscience, but probably we. still
have an impression that these explanations do not go to the root of the matter, and that they leave something
still unexplained. And here at last comes in an idea which is quite peculiar to psycho-analysis and alien to
ordinary ways of thinking. Its nature enables us to understand why the whole matter necessarily seemed
so confused and obscure to us. It tells us this: in the beginning conscience (more correctly, the anxiety which
later became conscience) was the cause of instinctual renunciation, but later this relation is reversed. Every
renunciation then becomes a dynamic fount of conscience; every fresh abandonment of gratification
increases its severity and intolerance; and if we could only bring it better into harmony with what we
already know about the development of conscience, we should be tempted to make the following
paradoxical statement: Conscience is the result of instinctual renunciation, or: Renunciation (externally
imposed) gives rise to conscience, which then demands further renunciations.
The contradiction between this proposition and our previous knowledge about the genesis of conscience is
not in actual fact so very great, and we can see a way in which it may be still further reduced. In order to
state the problem more easily, let us select the example of the instinct of aggression, and let us suppose that
the renunciation in question is always a renunciation of aggression. This is, of course, merely a provisional
assumption. The effect of instinctual renunciation on conscience then operates as follows: every impulse of
aggression which we omit to gratify is taken over by the super-ego and goes to heighten its aggressiveness
(against the ego). It does not fit in well with this that the original aggressiveness of conscience should
represent a continuance of the rigour of external authority, and so have nothing to do with renunciation. But
we can get rid of this discrepancy if we presume a different origin for the first quantum of aggressiveness
with which the super-ego was endowed.
When authority prevented the child from enjoying the first but most important gratifications of all,
aggressive impulses of considerable intensity must have been evoked in it, irrespective of the particular
nature of the instinctual deprivations concerned. The child must necessarily have had to give up the
satisfaction of these revengeful aggressive wishes. In this situation, in which it is economically so hard
pressed, it has recourse to certain mechanisms well known to us; by the process of identification it absorbs-33-
into itself the invulnerable authority, which then becomes the super-ego and comes into possession of all
the aggressiveness which the child would gladly have exercised against it. The child?s ego has to content
itself with the unhappy role of the authorityHthe fatherHwho has been thus degraded. It is, as so often, a
reversal of the original situation, CIf I were father and you my child, I would treat you badly. C The relation
between superego and ego is a reproduction, distorted by a wish, of the real relations between the ego,
before it was subdivided, and an external object. That is also typical. The essential difference, however, is
that the original severity of the super-ego does notHor not so muchHrepresent the severity which has been
experienced or anticipated from the object, but expresses the child?s own aggressiveness towards the latter.
If this is correct, one could truly assert that conscience is formed in the beginning from the suppression of
an aggressive impulse and strengthened as time goes on by each fresh suppression of the kind.
Now, which of these two theories is the true one? The earlier, which seemed genetically so unassailable, or
the new one, which rounds off our theories in such a welcome manner? Clearly, they are both justified, and
by the evidence, too, of direct observation; they do not contradict each other, and even coincide at one point,
for the child?s revengeful aggressiveness will be in part provoked by the amount of punishing aggression
that it anticipates from the father. Experience has shown, however, that the severity which a child?s superego
develops in no way corresponds to the severity of the treatment it has itself experienced. 30 It seems to
be independent of the latter; a child which has been very leniently treated can acquire a very strict
conscience. But it would also be wrong to exaggerate this independence; it is not difficult to assure oneself
that strict upbringing also has a strong influence on the formation of a child?s super-ego. It comes to this,
that the formation of the super-ego and the development of conscience are determined in part by innate
constitutional factors and in part by the influence of the actual environment; and that is in no way
surprisingHon the contrary, it is the invariable aetiological condition of all such processes. 31
30 As has rightly been emphasized by Melanie Klein and other English writers.
31 In his Psychoanalyse der Gesamtpersonlichkeit, 1927, Franz Alexander has, in connection with Aich-hornOs study
of dissocial behaviour in children, discussed the two main types of pathogenic methods of training, that of excessive
severity and of spoiling. The unduly lenient and indulgent father fosters the development of an over-strict super-ego
because, in face of the love which is showered on it, the child has no other way of disposing of its aggressiveness
than to turn it inwards. In neglected children who grow up without any love, the tension between ego and super-ego
is lacking; their aggressions can be directed externally. Apart from any constitutional factor which may be present,
therefore, one may say that a strict conscience arises from the co-operation of two factors in the environment: the
deprivation of instinctual gratification which evokes the childOs aggressiveness, and the love it receives which turns
this aggressiveness inwards, where it is taken over by the super-ego.
It may also be said that when a child reacts to the first great instinctual deprivations with an excessive
aggressiveness and a corresponding strictness of its super-ego, it is thereby following a phylogenetic
prototype, unheedful of what reaction would in reality be justified; for the father of primitive times was
certainly terrifying, and one may safely attribute the utmost degree of aggressiveness to him. The differences
between the two theories of the genesis of conscience are thus still further diminished, if one passes from
individual to phylogenetic development. But then, on the other hand, we find a new important difference
between the two processes. We cannot disregard the conclusion that man?s sense of guilt has its origin in
the Oedipus complex and was acquired when the father was killed by the association of the brothers. At
that time the aggression was not suppressed but carried out, and it is this same act of aggression whose
suppression in the child we regard as the source of feelings of guilt. Now, I should not be surprised if a
reader were to cry out angrily: CSo it makes no difference whether one does kill one?s father or does not, one
gets a feeling of guilt in either case! Here I should think one may be allowed some doubts. Either it is not
true that guilt is evoked by suppressed aggressiveness or else the whole story about the father-murder is
a romance, and primeval man did not kill his father any more often than people do nowadays. Besides this,
if it is not a romance but a plausible piece of history, it would only be an instance of what we all expect to
happen, namely, that one feels guilty because one has really done something which cannot be justified. And
what we are all waiting for is for psycho-analysis to give us an explanation of this reaction, which at any rate
is something that happens every day. C-34-
This is true, and we must make good the omission. There is no great mystery about it either. When one has
feelings of guilt after one has committed some crime and because of it, this feeling should more properly
be called remorse. It relates only to the one act, and clearly it presupposes that conscience, the capacity for
feelings of guilt, was already in existence before the deed. Remorse of this kind can, therefore, never help
us to find out the source of conscience and feelings of guilt in general. In these everyday instances the course
of events is usually as follows: an instinctual need acquires the strength to achieve fulfilment in spite of
conscience, the strength of which also has its limits, whereupon the inevitable reduction of the need after
satisfaction restores the earlier balance of forces. Psycho-analysis is quite justified, therefore, in excluding
the case of a sense of guilt through, remorse from this discussion, however frequently it may occur and
however great its importance may be practically.
But if man?s sense of guilt goes back to the murder of the father, that was undoubtedly an instance of
remorse, and yet are we to supposethat there were no conscience and feelings of guilt before the act on that
occasion? If so, where did the remorse come from then? This instance must explain to us the riddle of the
sense of guilt and so make an end of our difficulties. And it will do so, as I believe. This remorse was the
result of the very earliest primal ambivalence of feelings towards the father: the sons hated him, but they
loved him too; after their hate against him had been satisfied by their aggressive acts, their love came to
expression in their remorse about the deed, set up the super-ego by identification with the father, gave it the
father?s power to punish as he would have done the aggression they had performed, and created the
restrictions which should prevent a repetition of the deed. And since impulses to aggressions against the
father were repeated in the next generations, the feelings of guilt, too, persisted, and were further reinforced
every time an aggression was suppressed anew and made over to the super-ego. At this point, it seems to
me, we can at last clearly perceive the part played by love in the origin of conscience and the fatal inevitableness
of the sense of guilt. It is not really a decisive matter whether one has killed one?s father or abstained
from the deed; one must feel guilty in either case, for guilt is the expression of the conflict of ambivalence,
the eternal struggle between Eros and the destructive or death instinct. This conflict is engendered as soon
as man is confronted with the task of living with his fellows; as long as he knows no other form of life in
common but that of the family, it must express itself in the Oedipus complex, cause the development of
conscience, and create the first feelings of guilt. When mankind tries to institute wider forms of communal
life, the same conflict continues to arise Hin forms derived from the pastHand intensified so that a further
reinforcement of the sense of guilt results. Since culture obeys an inner erotic impulse which bids it bind
mankind into a closely-knit mass, it can achieve this aim only by means of its vigilance in fomenting an everincreasing
sense of guilt. That which began in relation to the father ends in relation to the community. If
civilization is an inevitable course of development from the group of the family to the group of humanity
as a whole, then an intensification of the sense of guiltHresulting from the innate conflict of ambivalence,
from the eternal struggle between the love and the death trendsHwill be inextricably bound up with it, until
perhaps the sense of guilt may swell to a magnitude that individuals can hardly support. One is reminded
of the telling accusation made by the great poet against the heavenly forces:
Ye set our feet on this lifePs road,
Ye watch our guilty, erring courses,
Then leave us, bowed beneath our load,
For earth its every debt enforces. 32
32 Goethe, Wilhelm Meister, WThe Song of the Harper. W
And one may heave a sigh at the thought that it is vouchsafed to a few, with hardly an effort, to salve from
the whirlpool of their own emotions the deepest truths, to which we others have to force our way,
ceaselessly groping amid torturing uncertainties.-35-
VIII
ONreaching the end of such a journey as this, the author must beg his readers to pardon him for not having
been a more skilful guide, not sparing them bleak stretches of country at times and laborious detours at
others. There is no doubt that it could have been done better. I will now try to make some amends.
First of all, I suspect the reader feels that the discussion about the sense of guilt oversteps its proper
boundaries in this essay and takes up too much space so that the rest of the subject-matter, which is not
always closely connected with it, gets pushed to one side. This may have spoilt the composition of the work;
but it faithfully corresponds to my intention to represent the sense of guilt as the most important problem
in the evolution of culture, and to convey that the price of progress in civilization is paid in forfeiting
happiness through the heightening of the sense of guilt. 33 What sounds puzzling in this statement, which
is the final conclusion of our whole investigation, is probably due to the quite peculiar relationHas yet
completely unexplainedH the sense of guilt has to our consciousness. In the common cases of remorse
which we think normal, it becomes clearly perceptible to consciousness; indeed, we often speak of
consciousness of guilt instead of sense of guilt. In our study of the neuroses, in which we have found
invaluable clues towards an understanding of normal people, we find some very contradictory states of
affairs in this respect. In one of these maladies, the obsessional neurosis, the sense of guilt makes itself loudly
heard in consciousness; it dominates the clinical picture as well as the patient?s life and lets hardly anything
else appear alongside of it. But in most of the other types and forms of neurosis it remains completely
unconscious, without its effect being any less great, however. Our patients do not believe us when we
ascribe an unconscious sense of guilt to them; in order to become even moderately intelligible to them, we have
to explain that the sense of guilt expresses itself in an unconscious seeking for punishment. But its
connection with the form of the neurosis is not to be over-estimated; even in the obsessional neurosis there
are people who are not aware of their sense of guilt or who perceive it only as a tormenting uneasiness or
kind of anxiety and then not until they are prevented from carrying out certain actions. We ought some day
to be able at last to understand these things; as yet we cannot. Here perhaps is the place to remark that at
bottom the sense of guilt is nothing but a topographical variety of anxiety, and that in its later phases it
coincides completely with the dread of the super-ego. The relation of anxiety to consciousness, moreover,
is characterized by the same extraordinary variations. Somewhere or other there is always anxiety hidden
behind all symptoms; at one moment, however, it sweeps into consciousness, drowning everything else with
its clamour, and at the next it secretes itself so completely that we are forced to speak of unconscious
anxietyHor if we want to have a cleaner conscience psychologically, since anxiety is after all only a
perceptionHof possibilities of anxiety. Consequently it is very likely that the sense of guilt produced by
culture is not perceived as such and remains to a great extent unconscious, or comes to expression as a sort
of uneasiness or discontent for which other motivations are sought. The different religions, at any rate, have
never overlooked the part played by the sense of guilt in civilization. What is more, they come forward with
a claim, which I have not considered elsewhere, 34 to save mankind from this sense of guilt, which they call
sin. We indeed have drawn our conclusions, from the way in which in Christianity this salvation is wonHthe
sacrificial death of one who therewith takes the whole of the common guilt of all upon himselfHabout the
occasion on which this primal sense of guilt was first acquired, that is, the occasion which was also the
inception of culture. 35
33 WThus conscience does make cowards of us all.... W That the upbringing of young people at the present day
conceals from them the part sexuality will play in their lives is not the only reproach we are obliged to bring against
it. It offends too in not preparing them for the aggressions of which they are destined to become the objects. Sending
the young out into life with such a false psychological orientation is as if one were to equip people going on a Polar
expedition with summer clothing and maps of the Italian lakes. One can clearly see that ethical standards are being
misused in a way. The strictness of these standards would not do much harm if education were to say: WThis is how
men ought to be in order to be happy and make others happy, but you have to reckon with their not being so. W
Instead of this the young are made to believe that everyone else conforms to the standard of ethics, i. e., that
everyone else is good. And then on this is based the demand that the young shall be so too.
34 Imean in The Future of an Illusion-36-
35 Totem and Taboo (1912).
It will not be very important, but it may be just as well to go more precisely into the meaning of certain
words like super-ego, conscience, sense of guilt, need for punishment, remorse, which we have perhaps often used
too loosely and in place of one another. They all relate to the same situation, but they denote different
aspects of it. The super-ego is an agency or institution in the mind whose existence we have inferred:
Conscience is a function we ascribe, among others, to the superego; it consists of watching over and judging
the actions and intentions of the ego, exercising the functions of a censor. The sense of guilt, the severity of
the super-ego, is therefore the same thing as the rigour of conscience; it is the perception the ego has that
it is watched in this way, the ego?s appreciation of the tension between its strivings and the standards of the
super-ego; and the anxiety that lies behind all these relations, the dread of that critical institution, the need
for punishment, is an instinctual manifestation on the part of the ego, which has become masochistic under
the influence of the sadistic super-ego, i. e., which has brought a part of the instinct of destruction at work
within itself into the service of an erotic attachment to the super-ego. We ought not to speak of conscience
before a super-ego is demonstrable; as to consciousness of guilt, we must admit that it comes into being
before the super-ego, therefore before conscience. At that time it is the direct expression of the dread of
external authority, the recognition of the tension between the ego and this latter; it is the direct derivative
of the conflict between the need for parental love and the urgency towards instinctual gratification, and it
is the thwarting of this urgency that provokes the tendency to aggression. It is because these two different
versions of the sense of guiltHone arising from dread of the external and the other from dread of the inner
authority Hare superimposed one on the other that our insight into the relations of conscience has been
hampered in so many ways. Remorse is a general term denoting the ego?s reaction under a special form of
the sense of guilt; it includes the almost unaltered sensory material belonging to the anxiety that is at work
behind the sense of guilt; it is itself a punishment and may include the need for punishment; it too, therefore,
may occur before conscience has developed.
Further, it will do no harm for us to review once more the contradictions which have confused us at times
during our enquiries. The sense of guilt, we said at one point, was the consequence of uncommitted
aggressions; but another time and, in particular, in the case of its historical beginning, the murder of the
father, it was the consequence of an aggression that was carried out. We also found a way out of this
difficulty. The development of the inner authority, the super-ego, was precisely what radically altered the
whole situation. Before this, the sense of guilt coincided with remorse; we observe, in saying this, that the
term remorse is to be reserved for the reaction after an actual performance of an aggressive deed. After this,
the omniscience of the superego robbed the distinction between intended aggressions and aggressions
committed of its significance; a mere intention to commit an act of violence could then evoke a sense of
guiltH as psycho-analysis has foundHas well as one which has actually been committedHas all the world
knows. The conflict of ambivalence between the two primal instincts leaves the same impress on the
psychological situation, irrespective of the change that has taken place in this. A temptation arises to look
here for an explanation of the mystery of the varying relation between the sense of guilt and consciousness.
The sense of guilt which is due to remorse for an evil deed must always have been conscious; that due to
a perception of an evil impulse could have remained unconscious. But it cannot be as simple as that: the
obsessional neurosis contradicts it emphatically. The second contradiction was that the aggressive energy
with which one imagined the super-ego to be endowed was, according to one view, merely a continuation
of the punitive energy belonging to external authority, preserved within the mind; whereas according to
another view it consisted, on the contrary, of aggressive energy originating in the self, levelled against this
inhibiting authority but not allowed to discharge itself in actions. The first view seemed to accord better with
the history of the sense of guilt, the second with the theory of it. More searching reflection has resolved this
apparently irreconcilable contradiction almost too completely; what remained as essential and common to
both was that in both cases we were dealing with an aggression that had been turned inward. Clinical
observation, moreover, really permits us to distinguish two sources for the aggressiveness we ascribe to the
super-ego, each of which in any given case may be operating predominantly, but which usually are both at
work together.-37-
This, I think, is the place to suggest that a proposal which I previously put forward as a provisional
assumption should be taken in earnest. In the latest analytical literature, 36 a predilection has been shown
for the view that any kind of privation, any thwarted instinctual gratification, results in a heightening of the
sense of guilt, or may do so. I believe one obtains a great simplification of theory if one regards this as valid
only for the aggressive instincts, and that little will be found to contradict this assumption. How then is it
to be explained dynamically and economically that a heightening of the sense of guilt should appear in place
of an unfulfilled erotic desire? This can surely only happen in a roundabout way: the thwarting of the erotic
gratification provokes an access of aggressiveness against the person who interfered with the gratification,
and then this tendency to aggression in its turn has itself to be suppressed. So then it is, after all, only the
aggression which is changed into guilt, by being suppressed and made over to the superego. I am convinced
that very many processes will admit of much simpler and clearer explanation if we restrict the findings of
psychoanalysis in respect of the origin of the sense of guilt to the aggressive instincts. Reference to the
clinical material here gives us no unequivocal answer, because, according to our own hypothesis, the two
kinds of instincts hardly ever appear in a pure form, unmixed with each other; but the investigation of
extreme cases would probably point in the direction I anticipate. I am tempted to extract our first advantage
from this narrower conception by applying it to the repression-process. The symptoms of neurosis, as we
have learned, are essentially substitutive gratifications for unfulfilled sexual wishes. In the course of our
analytic work we have found to our surprise that perhaps every neurosis masks a certain amount of
unconscious sense of guilt, which in its turn reinforces the symptoms by exploiting them as punishment.
One is now inclined to suggest the following statement as a possible formulation: when an instinctual trend
undergoes repression, its libidinal elements are transformed into symptoms and its aggressive components
into a sense of guilt. Even if this statement is only accurate as an approximation, it merits our interest.
36 In particular, in contributions by Ernest Jones, Susan Isaacs, Melanie Klein; also, as I understand, in those of Reik
and Alexander.
Some readers of this essay, too, may be under the impression that the formula of the struggle between Eros
and the death instinct has been reiterated too often. It is supposed to characterize the cultural process which
evolves in humanity; but it has been related also to the development of the individual, and, besides this, is
supposed to have revealed the secret of organic life in general. It becomes necessary for us to examine the
relation of these three processes to one another. Now, the repetition of the same formula is vindicated by
the consideration that the cultural processes, both in humanity and in the development of an individual, are
life-processes; consequently they must both partake of the most universal characteristic of life. On the other
hand, evidence of the presence of this universal characteristic does not help us to discriminate, unless it is
further narrowed down by special qualifications. We can therefore set our minds at rest only if we say that
the cultural process is the particular modification undergone by the life-process under the influence of the
task set before it by Eros and stimulated by Ananke, external necessity; and this task is that of uniting single
human beings into a larger unity with libidinal attachments between them. When, however, we compare
the cultural process in humanity with the process of development or upbringing in an individual human
being, we shall conclude without much hesitation that the two are very similar in nature, if not in fact the
same process applied to a different kind of object. The civilizing process in the human species is naturally
more of an abstraction than the development of an individual, and therefore harder to apprehend in concrete
terms, nor should the discovery of analogies be pushed to extremes; but in view of the similar character of
the aims of the two processesHin one the incorporation of an individual as a member of a group and in the
other the creation of a single group out of many individualsHthe similarity of the means employed and of
the results obtained in the two cases is not surprising. In view of its exceptional importance, we must no
longer postpone mention of one feature differentiating the two processes. The development of the individual
is ordered according to the program laid down by the pleasure-principle, namely, the attainment of
happiness, and to this main objective it holds firmly; the incorporation of the individual as a member of a
community, or his adaptation to it, seems like an almost unavoidable condition which has to be filled before
he can attain this objective of happiness. If he could achieve it without fulfilling this condition, it would
perhaps be better. To express it differently, we may say: Individual development seems to us a product of
the interplay of two trends, the striving for happiness, generally called egoistic, and the impulse towards
merging with others in the community, which we call altruistic. Neither of these descriptions goes far-38-
beneath the surface. In individual development, as we have said, the main accent falls on the egoistic trend,
the striving for happiness; while the other tendency, which may be called the cultural one, usually contents
itself with instituting restrictions. But things are different in the development of culture: here far the most
important aim is that of creating a single unity out of individual men and women, while the objective of
happiness, though still present, is pushed into the background; it almost seems as if humanity could be most
successfully united into one great whole if there were no need to trouble about the happiness of individuals.
The process of development in individuals must therefore be admitted to have its special features which are
not repeated in the cultural evolution of humanity; the two processes only necessarily coincide in so far as
the first also includes the aim of incorporation into the community.
Just as a planet circles round its central body, while at the same time rotating on its own axis, so the
individual man takes his part in the course of humanity?s development as he goes on his way through life.
But to our dull eyes the play of forces in the heavens seems set fast in a never-varying scheme, though in
organic life we can still see how the forces contend with one another and the results of the conflict change
from day to day. So in every individual the two trends, one towards personal happiness and the other
towards unity with therest of humanity, must contend with each other; so must the two processes of
individual and of cultural development oppose each other and dispute the ground against each other. This
struggle between individual and society, however, is not derived from the antagonism of the primal
instincts, Eros and death, which are probably irreconcilable; it is a dissension in the camp of the libido itself,
comparable to the contest between the ego and its objects for a share of the libido; and it does eventually
admit of a solution in the individual, as we may hope it will also do in the future of civilizationHhowever
greatly it may oppress the lives of individuals at the present time.
The analogy between the process of cultural evolution and the path of individual development may be
carried further in an important respect. It can be maintained that the community, too, develops a super-ego,
under whose influence cultural evolution proceeds. It would be an enticing task for an authority on human
systems of culture to work out this analogy in specific cases. I will confine myself to pointing out certain
striking details. The super-ego of any given epoch of civilization originates in the same way as that of an
individual; it is based on the impression left behind them by great leading personalities, men of outstanding
force of mind, or men in whom some one human tendency has developed in unusual strength and purity,
often for that reason very disproportionately. In many instances the analogy goes still further, in. that during
their livesH often enough, even if not alwaysHsuch persons are ridiculed by others, ill-used, or even cruelly
done to death, just as happened with the primal father who also rose again to become a deity long after his
death by violence. The most striking example of this double fate is the figure of Jesus Christ, if indeed it does
not itself belong to the realm of mythology which called it into being out of a dim memory of that primordial
event. Another point of agreement is that the cultural super-ego, just like that of an individual, sets up high
ideals and standards, and that failure to fulfil them is punished by both with anxiety of conscience. In this
particular, indeed, we come across the remarkable circumstance that the mental processes concerned here
are actually more familiar to us and more accessible to consciousness when they proceed from the group
than they can be in the individual. In the latter, when tension arises, the aggressions of the super-ego voicing
its noisy reproaches are all that is perceived, while its injunctions themselves often remain unconscious in
the background. If we bring them to the knowledge of consciousness, we find that they coincide with the
demands of the prevailing cultural super-ego. At this point the two processes, that of the evolution of the
group and the development of the individual, are always firmly mortised together, so to speak.
Consequently many of the effects and properties of the super-ego can be more easily detected through its
operations in the group than in the individual.
The cultural super-ego has elaborated its ideals and erected its standards. Those of its demands which deal
with the relations of human beings to one another are comprised under the name of ethics. The greatest value
has at all times been set upon systems of ethics, as if men had expected them in particular to achieve
something especially important. And ethics does in fact deal predominantly with the point which is easily
seen to be the sorest of all in any scheme of civilization. Ethics must be regarded, therefore, as a therapeutic
effort: as an endeavour to achieve something through the standards imposed by the super-ego which had
not been attained by the work of civilization in other ways. We already knowHit is what we have been-39-
discussingHthat the question is how to dislodge the greatest obstacle to civilization, the constitutional
tendency in men to aggressions against one another; and for that very reason the commandment to love
one?s neighbour as oneselfHprobably the most recent of the cultural super-ego?s demandsHis especially
interesting to us. In our investigations and our therapy of the neuroses we cannot avoid finding fault with
the super-ego of the individual on two counts: in commanding and prohibiting with such severity it troubles
too little about the happiness of the ego, and it fails to take into account sufficiently the difficulties in the
way of obeying itHthe strength of instinctual cravings in the id and the hardships of external environment.
Consequently, in our therapy we often find ourselves obliged to do battle with the super-ego and work to
moderate its demands. Exactly the same objections can be made against the ethical standards of the cultural
super-ego. It, too, does not trouble enough about the mental constitution of human beings; it enjoins a
command and never asks whether or not it is possible for them to obey it. It presumes, on the contrary, that
a man?s ego is psychologically capable of anything that is required of itHthat his ego has unlimited power
over his id. This is an error; even in so-called normal people the power of controlling the id cannot be
increased beyond certain limits. If one asks more of them, one produces revolt or neurosis in individuals or
makes them unhappy. The command to love our neighbours as ourselves is the strongest defence there is
against human aggressiveness and it is a superlative example of the unpsycho-logical attitude of the cultural
super-ego. The command is impossible to fulfil; such an enormous inflation of love can only lower its value
and not remedy the evil. Civilization pays no heed to all this; it merely prates that the harder it is to obey
the more laudable the obedience. The fact remains that anyone who follows such preaching in the present
state of civilization only puts himself at a disadvantage beside all those who set it at naught. What an
overwhelming obstacle to civilization aggression must be if the defence against it can cause as much misery
as aggression itself! Natural ethics, as it is called, has nothing to offer here beyond the narcissistic satisfaction
of thinking oneself better than others. The variety of ethics that links itself with religion brings in at this
point its promises of a better future life. I should imagine that as long as virtue is not rewarded in this life
ethics will preach in vain. I too think it unquestionable that an actual change in men?s attitude to property
would be of more help in this direction than any ethical commands; but among the Socialists this proposal
is obscured by new idealistic expectations disregarding human nature, which detract from its value in actual
practice.
It seems to me that the point of view which seeks to follow the phenomena of cultural evolution as
manifestations of a super-ego promises to yield still further discoveries. I am coming quickly to an end.
There is one question, however, which I can hardly ignore. If the evolution of civilization has such a farreaching
similarity with the development of an individual, and if the same methods are employed in both,
would not the diagnosis be justified that many systems of civilizationHor epochs of itHpossibly even the
whole of humanityHhave become neurotic under the pressure of the civilizing trends? To analytic
dissection of these neuroses, therapeutic recommendations might follow which could claim a great
practical interest. I would not say that such an attempt to apply psychoanalysis to civilized society would
be fanciful or doomed to fruitlessness. But it behooves us to be very careful, not to forget that after all we
are dealing only with analogies, and that it is dangerous, not only with men but also with concepts, to drag
them out of the region where they originated and have matured. The diagnosis of collective neuroses,
moreover, will be confronted by a special difficulty. In the neurosis of an individual we can use as a startingpoint
the contrast presented to us between the patient and his environment which we assume to be normal.
No such background as this would be available for any society similarly affected; it would have to be
supplied in some other way. And with regard to any therapeutic application of our knowledge, what would
be the use of the most acute analysis of social neuroses, since no one possesses power to compel the
community to adopt the therapy? In spite of all these difficulties, we may expect that one day someone will
venture upon this research into the pathology of civilized communities.
For various reasons, it is very far from my intention to express any opinion concerning the value of human
civilization. I have endeavoured to guard myself against the enthusiastic partiality which believes our
civilization to be the most precious thing that we possess or could acquire, and thinks it must inevitably lead
us to undreamed-of heights of perfection. I can at any rate listen without taking umbrage to those critics who
aver that when one surveys the aims of civilization and the means it employs, one is bound to conclude that
the whole thing is not worth the effort and that in the end it can only produce a state of things which no-40-
individual will be able to bear. My impartiality is all the easier to me since I know very little about these
things and am sure only of one thing, that the judgments of value made by mankind are immediately
determined by their desires for happiness: in other words, that those judgments are attempts to prop up
their illusions with arguments. I could understand it very well if anyone were to point to the inevitable
nature of the process of cultural development and say, for instance, that the tendency to institute restrictions
upon sexual life, or to carry humanitarian ideals into effect at the cost of natural selection, are developmental
trends which it is impossible to avert or divert, and to which it is best for us to submit as though they were
natural necessities. I know, too, the objection that can be raised against this: that tendencies such as these,
which are believed to have insuperablepower behind them, have often in the history of man been thrown
aside and replaced by others. My courage fails me, therefore, at the thought of rising up as a prophet before
my fellow-men, and I bow to their reproach that I have no consolation to offer them; for at bottom this is
what they all demandHthe frenzied revolutionary as passionately as the most pious believer.
The fateful question of the human species seems to me to be whether and to what extent the cultural process
developed in it will succeed in mastering the derangements of communal life caused by the human instinct
of aggression and self-destruction. In this connection, perhaps the phase through which we are at this
moment passing deserves special interest. Men have brought their powers of subduing the forces of nature
to such a pitch that by using them they could now very easily exterminate one another to the last man. They
know thisHhence arises a great part of their current unrest, their dejection, their mood of apprehension. And
now it may be expected that the other of the two heavenly forces, eternal Eros, will put forth his strength so
as to maintain himself alongside of his equally immortal adversary.